I hope not to increase the wave of racism that has gone dangerously high the last few years in Greece.
Have a lovely weekend. Happy crafting.
Produced by Greg Norman at Electrical Audio Studios in Chicago, Bless Them That Curse You contains many harsh, noise-laden, epic moments, but its overall tone is one of beauty and grace, wrapped in a darkness that feels more questioning than foreboding, and more mysterious than dismal. Although the material was largely improvised in the studio, the album sounds as though its members had been crafting music as a single unit for years.
What does Blackburn cheese taste like?
Restorative justice requires more than a quickie public exchange–
“Yeah?” Connor promptly stood, snatched up his binder and progress report, then stomped toward the door. “How this....up yours, you old windbag. What do you think of that?”
Or is the zombie, language itself (at least English). Zombies to the virus, language. Or is it Capitalism with it’s need to fetishize differences and assess value. Or are they one in the same, a language-based psychoanalytic drive to define self and other in object relations and at as many levels as possible. An Adam-instinct to name things. And if the Order of Things is at least somewhat culturally constructed, then we are creating the dualisms we perceive (at least in part). How we understand the difference of zombies and creatives is a narrative choice related to Latour’s terms “mediators” and “intermediaries” about how to account for agency in a system. And as with the Pasteurization of France, the narrative choices are significant to the development of the cultural knowledge and practices, almost moreso than the scientific advances themselves.
*Entry 6: Grab my New button and place it on your blog or web page and then comment back with your URL
Eddie: I went to prom four times in high school. Because I had a tuxedo. I was in orchestra.
Riot Games has gotten its fair share of its players money. And why not? It deserves our money. It’s made a great game.
- Make sure that you have a plan whenever you’re leaving a building. If you were to get attacked, do you know where you’d run to for help?
At the end of my visit, I was holding her hand and told her I had to go. I was standing and she looked up at me and said, "Ok." I told her next time I'd bring my wife with me. Then I told her how good it was to see her, and how much I'd missed her over the years.
Again and again and again ......
_____naked legs are my favorite, i don't mind if the above parts are also naked
She told me son, you better go upstairs
42) Hof van Cleve (Kruishoutem, Belgium)
What a wonderful husband! This is the point of this post. Have a wonderful day!
The house of hoarders falls apart
Updates to follow when this plan is in the bag.
The weather has been cool here today and drizzling rain, which is tempting me to really get creative and start those layouts that are floating around in my head. Yesterday seen me a lil nervous as I had a interview for my job application at the school for a permanent position. I received fabulous news this afternoon that I have been successful in obtaining the position, so I'M OVER THE MOON :):):):):)
Isn’t this more of a “sorry it took so long” situation? This was so bloody obvious that it surprises me that it has taken till now. Maybe there were technical reasons why this could not be done, and as a consumer I do not appreciate the work involved. Maybe.
The most enchanting city in the world...
in trying to eat more healthy this was one of my first recipes to try. I have some go to salads, but needed something to change it up. the flavor was layered-- the pears, bacon, craisins, and dressing mixed together extremely well. I added some shredded chicken and ate it with a glass of wine to balance out the salad and make it into a meal. this will make it into my go-to salad recipes.
So this isn't necessarily a "how-to" per se, but more of a post of tips. So let's get to it!
Summer is a challenging time for many parents, especially working parents who are used to sending their kids to school all day. Homeschool parents, in general, are used to having their kids around, but they too face a new set of challenges in the summer. Institutionally-schooled kids, for instance, are around -- which may or may not be a good thing, depending on your neighborhood.
“What do you think?” Rayanne asked.
New Wave Of New Wave... Or new wave of lets invent another pigeon hole to enable the NME to sell papers !
We are all gearing up for a busy month! The long dry summer is coming to an end! This past summer has got to be one of the worst summers as far as business is concerned that I can remember.
Jenny x
A nationwide star, the national broadcast of the Macy’s Thanksgiving Day Parade on NBC is one of the nation’s most viewed events. Millions of families tune-in from coast-to-coast to watch the telecast hosted by TODAY’s Matt Lauer, Meredith Viera and Al Roker. Airing from 9 a.m. to noon in each of the four time zones in the continental United States, the Thanksgiving Day star power extends to the exclusive performances of some of the hottest Broadway shows including American Idiot, Elf, and Memphis. In addition, the telecast will feature a special performance of NBC’s The Sing Along and the world-famous Radio City Rockettes® will return to kick start the holiday season.
Your charms need to be in my hands by June 15! I will email everyone my mailing address once the spots are all filled.
Friend, know that whoever you are, wherever you are, you are one of God’s dearly beloved, and that there is nothing in the world that can separate you from God’s love.
"The most interesting submissions, in my opinion, is from the 'Officials of the Delhi Patent Office'. Not only have these officials questioned the practice of outsourcing examinations to the CSIR, they have also criticized the quality of examinations conducted by the CSIR. These officials have also made some interesting recommendations on improving the internal systems of the patent office."
remembering a day
Girls, please please read that chart up there. If you think you're in an abusive relationship, don't be scared. Get help or get out of the relationship with him. You don't deserve to be with him and feel hurt all the time. Don't feel embarrassed, don't be scared. Stand up and be strong. It took the birth of my daughter to realize to be independent and stand up for myself and Little One too. You're all beautiful and never deserve to be yelled at or put down. You deserve a man who will love you for YOU and everything about you!
I've said it before...I'm not good at touchy feeley so this won't be like that
How dare Sen. McCain pretend to speak for the American people. He doesn't speak for me and he never has. He doesn't speak for conservatives.
However, our friend found a variety that is not prone to mildew so he planted that instead.
40,000 Norwegians, 15% of Oslo’s population, gathered recently to sing “Children of the Rainbow” from their cherished Kumbaya songbook. The venue was Young’s Square, the beating heart of Norway’s Soft Bolshevik, flanked by the headquarters of the Norwegian Labor Party, Liberal Party, and Norwegian Confederation of Trade Unions.
Oh, and don't forget, the We Blog Conference Live Twitter Party is tomorrow tonight. It's from 8 to 10 pm EST! Follow us on the hashtag #weBlogLIVE and maybe you will win something awesome!
I hope to bake her a better cake next year, when she turns 80!
Olympe de Cleves (Olympe de Cleves, 1851-2)
This is painting #2. Again, I love pears!
Also, I liked Kurt’s rendition of “I Have Nothing”. It’s a typical, climatic number but it’s fitting for him because he certainly impresses me with the fact he can reach notes waaay beyond my reach. Hmm, but perhaps that’s not saying much.
It did come as something of a shock, especially to those of us not issued with the requisite pogo-sticks by the local council. After all, when you look at the economic costs associated with it, there is a lot to be said for it. A pogo stick lane down the street takes up far less room than a bus lane as well as getting rid of all the unnecessary bus shelters and bus garages, not to mention the cost saving in bus drivers alone.
Clark's dough recipe calls for combo of whole wheat and white flour, a little sugar and an egg. The dough was quick to make and easy enough to roll out. The filling requires little more than the plums and sugar. I added some cinnamon for a little depth of flavor and lemon zest to counterbalance that.
11 Aug 2010: ABC Lateline: collapse of Alliance of Australian Retailers after big retailers withdraw following controversial ads.
One costs $695, the other two will run you upwards of $5000 each. Guesses?
Then Sunday, CV and I went to brunch, did some shopping, and then went to see The Hunger Games!
and emptiness, which sitting
“Oh, Dani, you’re back.” He bent without leaving his seat and retrieved his toy.
Less about heritage and more about property rights please. Is this to say that unless a property is heritage, that there are no property rights at all? Section 8 of the Land Act must be abolished. Eminent Domain Laws must be abolished. Allodial Property titles must be allowed to citizens. Any MP or Assembly person who does not concur with this intention of the Rakyat must immediately be considered unvotable.
Speaking of paper mache and paper clay, I need to photo the five little dolls I've been working on the past two weeks. They have cloth bodies, and their heads are paper mache and clay. Maddy went a little crazy over them, but I think she was just trying to make me feel good. They are in the range of 7-8 inches. I'll get some photos up in a couple days.
4. The Detroit Lions trying to get a win is like me trying to get a date in High School…
I keep threatening to take a hot yoga class at a little studio near my house. It's something I've been wanting to do since January until Life called and kind of threw me off kilter for a while.
“These renovations, sometimes unauthorised, are usually done to extend the front or sides of a premises. However, the renovation works often tend to disrupt neighbouring houses,” Mohd Iksan said.
* My mum always thinks i don’t like her food (i don’t eat much)
Next time you see a sleazy Washington politico making fatuous statements, remind yourself: at least we don’t have the likes of George Galloway to degrade our public discourse.
I’ll go one further and say that all the Consensus Takers and Zachriels and their ilk are the ones who do not understand. Socks don’t understand why they go in pairs, and steaks don’t understand why they’re sizzling. They are entirely acted on by external forces and have no say in the results. This is the madness: these are people who, while still drawing breath, have laid aside the ability to choose their path. They neither swim with nor against the tide – neither join nor jump the queue. That’s why their solution to disagreement is simply to abrogate it, and make the dissenter simply go along to get along. They can’t agree to disagree, because they aren’t truly capable of either of those mental activities. They can only check if the response matches that of units like themselves.
You can get the weight from the packaging, but I suggest weighing the turkey yourself. The bathroom scales work well for this. Bring them out of the bathroom and place on a sheet of newspaper on your kitchen counter. Place a large plate or tin on the scales and either zero it out or note the weight, place the turkey on the plate and subtract the difference. It is especially important that you weigh the turkey yourself if you add stuffing.
The issue goes to the heart of the issues over democracy in Malaysia and it raises huge concerns about the decisions by key world News organisations, such as the BBC, to get involved in commercial deals with repressive regimes like BN.
I hope you are enjoying your Spring days
Let us leave Arabs to keep living the only way they can, by their 'indigenous values,' and let us keep our 'universal values' where they belong-- in that universe called the West.
Yes, this is the one that's an Honor Student.
I love your cool mornings, your warm afternoons and cool nights. I love collecting the last harvest from the garden, raking leaves into piles for my children to jump in, and noses red from the crisp autumn air.
Cotton floral Blouse - Boden
-1980 World Tour-
-If you have pledged before, you can take it again for competition
O-R-A-N-G-E ORANGE
While exploring Central Square in Cambridge, I found Thelonious Monkfish, a restaurant that specializes in Sushi, Japanese and Thai food. They state that their tagline is "Jazz for the Palate because we love to jam on Asian culinary themes." I looked at the menu in the window and it was a short list of small plates which sounded enticing, so I figured I would stop in and try a few things.
It goes without saying that my mother was my very best friend right up until the day she died. We were so close that I even called her up to tell her about the first time I made out with a boy and that was before there were cell phones.
...there was nothing not to like about this place in my opinion :)
I am well on my way to being slapped like Ouisa Boudreaux.
So I must have made the right impressed as I got asked back and offered a paid position. I managed not to get shot like some poor work ex at Chelsea by Ashley Cole and hadn't just made cups of tea. I had grafted though my feet and legs told me that. Standing for 14 hours two days on the trot is not good for you!
MFBB.
May 3, 2012, 5:19 p.m.
Great Divide Brewing Company Ridgeline Amber Ale
The machine is programmed to follow the rising sun, so we begin over the Pacific. Though some European explorers have made contact with the various groups of Pacific islands, their influence has been small; indigenous Polynesian peoples still live their various diverse forms of life, largely undisturbed. The same can be
Maybe, when people tire of Britpop's Sixties new wave tunnel-vision, that period will be rediscovered. But so far I've only ever encountered one band who cite The Slits as an influence: New York's goddess-and-Gaia-obsessed pagan funkateers, Luscious Jackson. Singer Jill Cunniff declared: "There was a time when The Slits were the epitome, the ultimate, the coolest of the cool. They were everything I wanted from life."
always got.
"Fancy a female finding an Allen key to fit."
"Manuel's reputation is born of good results. He is one of the most successful finance ministers in the world. In a typical country, one would think institutions and policies are so strong it does not matter who the personality in control is.
So tired of your negligence becoming my emergency. Tired of posing as the irresponsible one because of a mistake you made.
The ‘mutual friend’ then went to another Immobilier who knew of the property and made an offer and is now in the process of purchasing the house.
Imagine yourself living debt-free and building a million-dollar retirement safely and securely, so you can have total confidence in yourself and your future.
And this brings us to the second of the two definitions of genocide the deliberate infliction on the targeted group of conditions of life, calculated to bring about its physical destruction in whole or in part. It is that second act of genocide which I will address in part 2 of this essay
The question is will they, or whoever forms the next government, act to protect infants and mothers? And if not, why not? See:
Make cards or flowers to give to others - here are some links to flowers and cards that I like -
This simple garment made from ceder bark has more presence as an object than any piece of clothing I will ever buy. Modern production, it seems, has sacrificed form to function. When I look around my room I see few objects that I care very much about. My desk could be any desk; my lamp any lamp, my dresser any dresser. When I move in a few months I will leave most of these things behind. I might miss having a desk for a little while, but I won’t miss this one in particular because it’s not particular. I bought it from a chain store. I can get the same desk again in New Jersey if I want.
Follow the instructions below and note the fabulously stunning DT creation from Lisa using freebie Zoe....I named these images Bookworm Zoe and Henry, but as hubby just pointed out, they have their face in a book (Facebook!) - how spooky and definitely not planned....I can be a bit dim sometimes :o)
Pigeon Key is actually 2-miles further south only accessible via the old 7-Mile Bridge by walking or bicycle. You can still reach Pigeon Key via boat with ticket available for sale inside the visitor center. The old tourist Flagler Express Train that your parents might have taken has been retired due to concerns of how much weight the old bridge could hold.
I took the kids to lunch to watch our neighbor (and, really, we have to come up with a better designation for him because he's family and 'neighbor' just doesn't sound right) sing and play guitar. He and his friend pick up gigs around town and this was the first time he had one during the day so the kids could go.
Fish oil also plays an important role in ridding the brain of unwanted substances:
It's my 15th wedding annivesary tomorrow, so I'm having a giveaway to celebrate!
This thesis was strengthened when Seracini discovered that Vasari painted a soldier holding a flag on which is written "Cerca Trova", i.e. "Seek and Ye shall find", which can be a clue for the future generations.
It is with this post that I am inaugurating the blog’s category New Food for Privacy Thoughts. Because it really makes me think about the scope of privacy protection legislation when reading such news:
This double 10" was released in a numbered edition of 1750 copies. The first 500 numbered copies were pressed on colored vinyl, while the rest of the edition (501-1750) were pressed on black vinyl. There also exist between 100-150 additional unnumbered copies stamped for promotional use only. Each is stamped on each inner record sleeve and on the back of the beautifully printed enveloped fold-out cover.
How could you possibly resist this little face?
United States Courthouse
Scoop it on to your plate, let it cool, and enjoy!
‘‘It had started to break up long before April, 1970.’’ Says Damian Smyth, author of the recently published , The Beatles and Ireland. ‘‘Really, you can look at it as something that had just gone full circle. Gradually, they found the whole business of being a Beatle claustrophobic and when Epstein, their manager, died they were a band without a rudder.’’
By enacting this Law, the Government intends that it will be no longer possible for patentees to cancel or suspend MAs, retail prices or reimbursement decisions for generics medicines.
It has become a bit more smooth,
I started thinking about how myopic the MPAA has decided to be on this issue, and how offensive that is to me…
Traditional news outlets have struggled with staff attrition. Small and mid-sized newspapers still provide quality watchdog functions to their readers. They may have to pick their spots, however, without the greater bandwidth of a large staff. There are some local broadcast outlets that provide valuable accountability journalism. The Raleigh-Durham market is an excellent one in that respect.
~4~
She was trying to put on stuff that if you eyed it, you just knew it wasn’t going to fit, but she was determined to make it work.
A sponsored excavation was finally made possible this year after investigations begun in 2007 by Rhynie Environs Archaeological Project (REAP), in a collaboration between the two universities’ archaeological departments, led by Dr Gordon Noble (UA) and Dr Meggen Gondek (UC). Their interest was piqued by positive resistivity surveys taken in 2005 and 2006, but they were unable to raise sufficient backing to begin. They have discovered three giant enclosures standing close together, one of them a ‘Peel’, surrounded by a massive pallisaded wooden structure of spiked tree-trunks: the ultimate impenetrable fence.
Stat-wise, it has excellent Sp Defense, good Sp Attack and Defense, but not great Speed. Despite being Psychic type, it learns many Dark type moves by level-up. Its ability is Frisk, which isn’t all that great in battle, though it can get Shadow Tag from the Dreamworld.
The work is a sculptural hodgepodge constructed with spaceage materials. If one takes the advice of critics like Hal Foster or Rosalind Krauss, Ovalle’s iceberg seems to combine the entire history of sculpture from the imposing quality of the monument, to the transparent, visible armature of constructivism, to the site specific quality of the earthworks and minimalism. Adding to this formalist progression, however, Ovalle’s hopes to present a more globally conscious metaphor, rendering a story conjuring water crises, melting borders, and global warming. The iceberg is to become a wide open symbol which Ovalle hopes to reign in through the economical vocabulary of minimalism.
Still need to plant: Anaheim pepper, jalapenos, cayenne peppers, roma tomatoes, Beefmaster tomatoes, Mortgage Lifter tomatoes, sweet 100 cherries, yellow cherries, Paul Robeson purple tomatoes, cucumbers, zucchini, Orangelo watermelon, a variety of fall squash, a variety of summer squash (scallop squash) canteloupe, basil, sage, rosemary, thyme and beets. It may be too late for the beets, but I’ll plant a few and see what happens. If it doesn’t do well, it will go in the ground again closer to fall along with turnips, garlic and more spinach, swiss chard, lettuces and broccoli.
At any good culinary institute, students will acquire important skills in culinary, organising and management. Students will begin with basic culinary skills such as knife skills, cooking methods, timing, mise en place (Preparation prior to service), creative plates & presentations, flavor & seasoning, cooking on the line and others. Being well organized is key to running a successful kitchen. Ordering, scheduling, food costing, and dealing with suppliers are just some of the work involved. Chefs need to work in a team and as an Executive Chef, he or she will need to manage the kitchen staff well. The intricacies of motivating staff and getting the best out of them are important. Ultimately, the Chef will become a mentor to other chefs and having people skills is important to impart his or her skills to the next generation.
The copy editor needs a good general knowledge and Classical education as well as an unrivalled command of English. Writers hate copy editors who mess with things and then get them wrong. Professional writers have generally checked their work carefully; copy editors should check any corrections they want to make equally carefully.
Peace out y'all
Betty Crocker Save $1/1 decorating icing (5/31)
Cyril Jordan – guitar & vocals
So, after that hatchet job, what remains of Edward Foster's legacy? He is unlikely to have had noble ancestry, he does not appear to have served in the miltary, probably never had royal patronage, let alone a royal appointment, and did not live to be a hundred (he was ninety years old when he died). For me it is his fine body of work that stands out, dozens - perhaps hundreds - of gilt-tinged black and reddish brown silhouettes in public and private collections, most signed simply below the bust with "Foster Pinxit" (Foster painted it) and a date, and a good proportion with the trademark "Foster & Crown" brass hanger. If you have a Foster silhouette in your collection, I'd very much appreciate seeing a scan or photograph of it, and if you would be happy for it to be shared via this blog, so much the better.
He hung up there on that old cross
Today in the Times I read that a lady who lives near to Hull, is putting her house on the market because her neighbour insists on hanging out the washing on a line which then spoils her view. It seems that it is a man who is hanging out the washing - and that the said washing includes "his wife's knickers" (shock, horror). All I can say is - a MAN hanging out the washing? Surely that is a first (sorry men, I know that isn't true, but let's say it is a bit unusual.) "Why doesn't he own a dryer, like everyone else?"
And I’m still growing, so if not operated on, my spinal curve will continue, as it has done, to grow ever more pronounced and my ribs, hips and shoulders will rotate, contort and compress even further. Being told I needed imminent spinal surgery to straighten, fuse and pin my spine was a shock that took some time to sink in. And then I was given a date for the operation. It is scheduled for 3 days time, on Weds 20th October - providing that nothing happens to postpone it
Importantly–how can you have a story that encompasses a sense of the infinite and yet is not part of human consciousness or realizable in human experience?
i asked my friend
I know one of the best ways of physically getting out of debt is to have Faith. Not only to believe that windfall or a lottery win will come by one day but by also gradually commit to pay off your debt regularly, and also in good time.
Ruhatit time on the zebra-moun acceleration calls her the mother of the eternals.
In my opinion, this third section of the book is the strongest section. Every Christian will learn from Morrows example of hos to think and apply Biblical truth to every area of culture. Morrow does not shy away from the hard issue and questions. He is decidedly against the Bible supporting homosexuality and yet he addresses the issue with sensitivity and love. He is against idolizing creation through our caring of it yet rightly states that humans are the pinnacle of God’s creation and not to be valued as less than it. He does not minimize the tension in our society and the church between science and faith and provides a thoughtful and honest evaluation of the current debate.
Everyone checked their feet. “Maybe, none of us where using headlamps,” Ari replied.
Whether or not your future employers, professors, or colleagues have heard of your international institution, they will admire the exposure, language skills, and interesting perspective you bring to the table. An international degree suggests a certain level of resilience and curiosity that
They were amazing...........
Click this link.
I think that it means a lot.
So what does this have to do with feelings? When our kids want to do something that we don’t agree with, it seems to be the easiest and most popular route to react to what is being requested.
For whatever we lose(like a you or a me)
WILDE JA, McMILLAN JA, SERWINT J, BUTTA J, O’RIORDAN MA, STEINHOFF MC. Effectiveness of influenza vaccine in health care professionals. A randomized trial. J Am Med Assoc JAMA 1999; 281: 908-913.
I see nothing wrong in anyone saying over me that NAME JESUS that is above every name. They may lay hands on me in that NAME and they may immerse me in that precious name. I don’t mind at all. It is that name that saves. It is Jesus who bled and died for me and no one else. I have nothing against that name. Say it over me all you want.
You have changed my perspective in things
Apart from science, suspense and thrill, these books can also be full of melodrama and tragedy. It simply depends on the creativity of the writer and the ability to deal with a wide variety of expressions in these interesting books. In these stories, readers get to experience the various mysterious circumstances and the wonderful transcendence of the characters. These drama stories showcase myriad expressions and intense emotions which may arise through various conditions in life. With the spine chilling enigma, these suspense thrillers serve great adventure for readers. In addition, these characters have different shades and various kinds of intentions.
The first was seeing a little 3 or 4 year old boy with his parents visiting the shrine of Sayyidda Zaynab for the first time. He looked cute wearing his 'Friday' best - a little suit and red bow tie.
"How did this happen?" he asks.
There is a distinct possibility of Mallinson's Chinook. Well it came on last night according to Twitter and there will be some left won't there? No negative vibes please.
Some things we love about Parker:
021.054 YUSUFALI: He said, "Indeed ye have been in manifest error - ye and your fathers."
In unchallengy news: These are a few of the party decorations I made for the shower I hosted. I totally underestimated the time required to pump these out and was up until 2am Saturday night:) Lesson to be learned for the Christmas version.
5s -
228All my loose soul unbounded springs to thee.
I eventually found one I really liked, that is up to date, well organised, honest in its comments without being patronising or vague and seemed geared towards the kind of readers I hope will like my work.
Meanwhile television is telling us to feel sympathy for immigrants and how ill-used they have been. They boost them but put us down. The neglect is psychological and subliminal. We are left out of adverts as the typical unit is portrayed as a black with a white woman.
The next thing to note is that the people must be subject (or submit as in some translations like the NIV) to the government of the day.
As you can see from the screen shot above all 367 had given Bob's "OOOH they are such nasty Nazis" comment a negative rating, whilst nobody had given him a positive one.
The reality: success, or lack thereof, will drive you crazy. Making art may be the only thing that will keep you sane.
So much left to say
Twisted Macaroni & Cheese
Assuming the tests don't show up anything nasty then apparently my GP will be able to take it from there and I won't have to go back to see Dr Heartsink. This pleased me so much that I didn't feel like explaining to Dr Heartsink that my GP is a lovely chap, but 'taking it from there' is not his forte. Nor did I point out that referring a patient to a dietician is only going to be of benefit if said patient has the ability to follow that dietary advice. It tends to be awfully practical and involve skills I do not possess. Like the functional ability to prepare and cook food. These however are not issues for a consultant to address, or even something that they would consider. The dietician will scratch her head quite a bit, wonder if getting social services in might help, then dump the problem back on me...hopefully not having taken it upon herself to actually contact social services as their input can only make the situation worse and the only answer any of them will come up with is 'ready meals'. Its that kind of healthy eating that the new Personal Indepdence Payment was predicated upon. So people like me who've managed to avoid some of these issues by being able to use money from Disability Living Allowance to buy more nutritionally balanced ready prepared food won't be able to do that any more. Instead we'll bounce from GP, to consultant, to dietician, to Occupational Therapist probably via Social Services and back round again while everyone mumbles about it not being their area, oh and the cuts, and the patient doesn't get fed. I have learnt this lesson well and know the choice is usually between eating food that isn't necessarily nutritionally the ideal option for me or not eating because I can't prepare it for myself.
a third one all within a few miles of where she lives. If you think about it please say a prayer
That said, I do rather recoil in horror at some of the things Catholics have been writing about marital rape according to one blogpost that CIW pens and some of the things Catholics say about Jews on the internet which can, as we know, be most unpleasant. All in all, however, I do get the impression that this individual must have to spend quite a bit of time to get to genuinely offensive Catholic blogs and I get the impression that this individual might just generally also despise faithful lay and priest Catholics and perhaps, maybe, just maybe, the Pope too.
Get creative! Stamp, stick, color, punch, etc..... Once you have finished close the wallet with a paper clip, or a binder clip as I have below. I added a nice little ribbon to mine to make it a bit more fancier.
An excited Mahesh Bhatt claims, “ We at Vishesh Film, don’t get excited on budgets and make our films in cost -effective manner, that’s the DNA of our company and our co-producers Viacom 18 Motion Pictures understood the content well and marketed it equally interestingly and effectively , from the music launch at the yacht, to focused promotions of the movie in b -towns and smaller markets, highlighted the fact that they had the same persistence and passion for the film as ours. This marriage between crisp content and brilliant marketing helped us to attain success at the box office of our film.”
Preheat oven to 475-degrees. Place the potato wedges in a large mixing bowl. Cover with hot water; soak for 10-30 minutes. Put 4 tablespoons of the oil onto a heavy rimmed baking sheet. Tilt the sheet side to side to evenly coat the pan with oil. Sprinkle the pan evenly with the salt and pepper. Set aside.
The Wilson-Terpil case is a story of Americans who meet secretly in bars and board rooms to arrange the illegal sale of electronic-spying equipment and terrorist weapons, and of Americans who train assassins abroad. It is a story of an old-boy network of former C.I.A. operatives and military men, and a story of present and past C.I.A. leaders who seem unable to face fully the implications of the case.It tells of a basic inability of the Government’s investigative and law-enforcement agencies to perform effectively. And it suggests that a moral climate exists inside and on the edges of the intelligence community which results in the subversion of national goals to personal gain.
When my heart won’t shatter from shame
The seconds,
It was a case of so close but so far for the Blackburn Hawks as they brought the curtain down on the English National league season with a playoff final loss to the Billingham Stars. A capacity crowd were on hand to witness the Stars cap a remarkable season.
6-8 sprigs cilantro, chopped for garnish
The contest is open until October 8, 2011 (two weeks). I'll use Random.org to select a winner!
Have fun and I look forward to seeing your cards.
Here's the chalkboard sign welcoming shoppers. Yes, hagglers and cheapskates were definitely welcome with us. I am one myself, so bring your "a" game and let's make a deal, folks. ;)
Ps: the weird thing was....we had been extra careful to not get involved in accidents etc.. Job en I in Holland and the boys in the UK was a strange thing. Anyway....just a few seconds after our last turn in our village, on the way home, and me thanking God that we were still ok (and the thought that anything could still happen in that last mile (but that not being very likely)), there was a German guy, approaching us on the 'wrong' side of the road. Luckily, we were both driving slowly.....but that was scary for a second of five!
If you can judge a place by its trails, Sharlie is in the right place. There is an energy out here, once out of the shiny, busy noise of the Silicone Valley bubble, a healing and quiet energy of open space.
But, he admitted, had the family associated
When we say something out loud, it really changes the atmosphere around us. Speak out the solution! If you’re going through financial struggles, say, “My God shall supply all my needs according to his glorious riches in Messiah Yeshua”. If you are feeling depressed, sad or angry declare, “The joy of the LORD is my strength.” If you are sick speak out, “By His stripes I am healed!”
I think most people have a love/hate relationship with sneakers, especially when they think of the white athletic type. I want to state from the outset - white athletic sneakers are not shoes, they are sports equipment, and therefore should only be worn when engaging in sport/exercise. However, there are literally thousands of "fashion" sneakers that are a great addition to a casual wardrobe. Paired with casual pants, like jeans or cords, sneakers are a great option, especially for mums that are constantly running after young toddlers! I am not against white sneakers, but I generally prefer either black sneakers, or brightly coloured ones. Mine are from Ecco, but Puma, Adidas and numerous other brands also make some great ones. I also like the old-school tennis shoe type, like the ones by Bensimmon or Superga.
Woofs
has founded a number of companies and is one of the 10 richest members of the United States Congress estimated to be worth at least $65.91 million. He founded American Information Systems, an internet access, web hosting and application service provider.
I was telling someone the other day, someone who's trying to decide whether or not they want to do a podcast with me, that if they're not excited by the idea, I'd just rather forget it. All by myself, I've got enough enthusiasm to power the world. But put me with someone who doesn't have any, and trying to generate enough to share? It's exhausting. It makes me want to lie down. + vodka. Or maybe scotch. No, wait: I tried that one time; it tasted like engine cleaner.
*ARC provided by publisher
The 'dough' is more like a thick, gunky cake mix, so you can't shape it as such – just nudge it out of the bowl with a spatula and plop it into the floured hot, cast-iron casserole. Bung on the lid and half an hour or so later you'll smell cooked bread . . . mmmmmm!
﻿It's with a great deal of excitement (and a good bit of trepidation too!) that I start on my blogging adventure. I'm certainly more at home in the kitchen than in front of the computer but I am looking forward to sharing my passion for food, my creative experiences in the kitchen, my travels and general delights of life with you all. I'm also looking forward to discovering something about you! So far my relationship with my readers has been largely a 'one way street' but I do hope that you will leave comments and ask questions here on my blog or by email (there's an 'email me' button on my sidebar).
SIDEBAR: Good gosh Ive lost thirty pounds of football weight! Don’t mind putting some o that back on for sure….. but I guess its all good in the long run cuz it wasnt the healthiest……had someone close mention I was built like a tank. Hehehe have to admit it was nice to get to the gym and see the runts scatter. But deep down I know this is better for me health wise. So I should shut up.
The tree is done. The other decorations are done. The outside lights are ... well, if I have the energy to tackle the one tree that refuses to work (which is currently residing in the garage), then they're done, too. And the shopping is thisclose to being done, I think, as Peach and Olive have finalized their respective lists.
Today there are more than 110 Minnesota marketing events listed for 2011!! For the remainder of January alone, there are 18 different events listed. So warm up your January with some networking and head on over to:
Turns out I had about a minute to spare as I ended up coming in at 3:39:07. I bettered my time from Boston by more than 17 minutes. I was very pleased with my time as I trained very hard to get to this point. I think all the speed work at the track really paid off for me. All those 800s and mile repeats were killer but they were worth it!
of your fabulous creations
Had the authors of PPACA set up an “uninsured patient tax”, with anyone who buys qualifying insurance exempted from said tax, the lawsuit against PPACA would be dead in its tracks. Now, there might be states rights claims against the Medicaid expansion, and I suppose one could argue that the state exchanges infringe on states rights, as well. But those seem like huge leaps.
My belly is HUGE i think i am as big as i was with miss thing in week 30..
Does anyone else have an amazing mascara routine or product that they love!?
So, ‘BNP is out to save war criminals’ is not likely to prove as effective as the AL might have hoped for. Plus, if the trial continues in its farcical nature, then protests from Amnesty et al will make things that much more uncomfortable for the government.
The first step to wrangling an out-of-control closet is to empty it completely and take stock of what you have. This will also give you an opportunity to get rid of what you don’t need and relocate what belongs elsewhere, which is the most important step.
still love you
Able to use word processing, spreadsheet and Project Management application
I am planning on using today’s lunch break as the tipping point. I am going to write a bit on this novel even if I don’t feel like it. In terms of this project, it is indeed time to nut up or shut up. 60 pages in and I already know the skeleton of the story and am closely tied to the primary characters. It is looking to be a rather long and uncomfortable book (as a writer and, hopefully, for the readers).
Very short post tonight, it’s getting late and I’m feeling tired after my body pump class!
1 carrot peeled and chopped
Pineapple Vinaigrette, recipe follows
Displaying her colorful patterns.
Interior magazines and publications are a source of an inspiration to me. I love to browse
When she has leftover scraps from a project, she spends a little time at the end of her day, takes some of the fabrics, and cuts them into 2 1/2" (or 1 1/2") strips. Then she chooses three different fabric strips, joins them into two different arrangements (light, dark, light and dark, light, dark) strips and cuts them into 2 1/2" (or 1 1/2") strips so that she can make nine-patch blocks. After she makes the blocks, she places them into a basket until she has enough to make a scrappy quilt from those blocks.
Not fun. Thinking about it, I’ll need to check the figures for population over the last few decades for Wichita. Maybe for the county over there. And then, on another thought, maybe not. The industry is heavily unionized. There are some things I’d rather not know – who am I kidding. I’ll check.
Keep my eyes open wide to all surrounding me
Come see our new window display and the many new additions to the shop. We would love to see you and give you our usual "royal treatment"! Delivery available everywhere.......
Also, most a cappella puts a new spin on songs, unlike more and more of Glee lately (I do not need another shot-for-shot Britney Spears video. Come on, Ryan Murphy).
As many have said, we don’t have a fracking problem, we have a democracy problem. So today I am standing strong WITH my city council, my mayor, and my fellow citizens. Today I pledging my support and letting my city government know I have their back. I hope you will join me.
@lewisschaffer
Humans are more complex than mice, and even though repetition will break down anyone’s resistance to stress (given enough time at the front lines under artillery bombardment, all soldiers suffer shell shock, for example), we are affected more severely if stresses arrive unpredictably and in a way that is out of our control. This helps explain why a child coming from a situation of abuse, with an unpredictable alcoholic parent, for example, can be feel the harm of this experience for life. When you can find no escape, and bad things happen out of the blue, stress takes a heavy toll.
I commit myself to walking a process of self transformation where I take responsibility for myself and in this change and transform all that is me as every and all relationships that exist as me into relationships that always support what is best for all in all ways.
lose to Obama
Kay helped me give both of the goats their follow-up Ivermectin and I got clocked in the eye by Chickie's horn. Luckily, there is no black eye, but there is an alarming 'floater' every now and then. I am keeping a close (inner) eye on it - pun intended - in case it doesn't go away or changes, but everything seems to be okay. This farming business is dangerous!
To keep things fast & simple, both cards are made with the MME Miss Caroline Dolled Up 6x6 designer paper pad. I selected cardstock and cut the die pieces first, and then stamped the Papertrey Ink Mega Mixed Messages Easter sentiment on the front.
Seasonal PT position: Fall 2011 – Winter 2012 (3- and 6-month internships)
My knitting and spinning mojo was gone. And I mean really gone. But I think I feel it coming back.
Watercolours is a new thing for me, but I am quite enjoying it,
Rolls in and
A few weeks ago I was doing research for my blog and stumbled upon three great fashion sites. The first being Polyvore, a website that allows you to make an image collage of fashion items, creating a complete outfit. The second site is LOOKBOOK.nu. LOOKBOOK.nu allows people, from all over the world, to post images of outfits they have created as inspiration for others. The third site is Weardrobe, like LOOKBOOK.nu, it is an outfit sharing site. Weardrobe provides a platform for people to share photos of what they wear. So what do these sites have to do with my recent obsession with saving money, via the restrictions of a shopping list? They are the shopping lists.
Jesus, forgive me. Help me to relax. To rest. Every moment. Bring to my attention these choices that do not honor You, the moment I try to take my life into my own incapable hands. You are so much better at orchestrating my life than I could ever be. You are the Author and Finisher of my faith, and You are the perfect and faithful Author of the story of my life as well. You are so very capable, so absolutely good. I can rest, and I CHOOSE to rest, in knowing that You allow only what is best for me; regardless of whether I understand it or not. I will trust You. I will believe Your promises. I repent of my attempts to control my own life. I cannot do it! And Lord, I will relax. Help me to slow down, to enjoy what You have given me. To live life to the fullest. To savor all the little things, the little moments.
Family and Friends: Best friend is Sheriff Andy Taylor. (According to the first episode, Andy and Barney are cousins, but subsequent episodes seem to dispute that relationship.) Barney was the best man at Andy's wedding and godfather to Opie. Barney dated Hilda Mae and then Juanita Beasley, a waitress at the Junction Cafe and later the Bluebird Diner. Thelma Lou became his long-time girlfriend and they eventually married (but not during the run of The Andy Griffith Show). Barney had a cousin named Virgil (Michael J. Pollard). Barney's mother appeared only in the second episode.
I have to say this about Carlsberg. It’s been a while old friend. I’ve flirted with other cooking lagers and had a romance with Foster’s, but Carlsberg will always be a love of mine, from the first swig to the final belch. Cooking lager heaven.
To make advertising powerful and effective, the affiliate must use smart methods of advertising. An example of smart advertising is the re-use of one key concept of affiliate marketing – the harnessing of human resources. What this means, is that an affiliate may tap on the capacities of others to bring more visitors to the website.
I talked about it before that I hoped Punkin would be ready to start the potty training process this spring/summer. Then he is wasn't talking as much as I thought he would be (and now he is talking up a storm!!!) and just didn't show as many of the signs of being ready as I thought. I know we aren't far but we aren't so close either.
But there are some shocks in store for Jack: the ‘Devil’s World’ might be completely isolated and inaccessible, but its inhabitants worship Torchwood. And before he can find out why, or how this is even possible, he finds himself arrested for murder.
The key to subsection 1021(e) is its claim that sec. 1021 does not “affect existing law or authorities” relating to the detention of persons arrested on U.S. soil. If the President’s expansive view of his own power were in statute, that statement would be true. Instead, the section codifies the President’s view as if it had always existed, authorizing detention of “persons” regardless of citizenship or where they are arrested. It then disingenuously says the bill doesn’t change that view.
Then I found I wanted to just post general day to day things so The Streaming Now was started, and then I wanted to keep my prompt writing separate....another blog. etc. etc. You get the idea. :-)
Seriously, I scrapbooked for over 15 years and have 25 HUGE, FULL albums.
- Posted using BlogPress from my iPhone4
Fine. I guess that means that I’ll just have to keep going now, won’t it? At some point the weight loss will be obvious because I’ll have to buy new pants that don’t fall down, a new bra because the cups are too empty (oh, that’s a joy I SERIOUSLY look forward to!), and sexier tops because the back fat is fading away.
Heat a tawa and pour a ladleful of batter as you do with regular dosa batter and spread out. Sprinkle oil and cook on both sides.
I did not have a lot prepared, and had not done OD&D since the pub game earlier in this year, but I dove in the last few days whenever I had a few minutes and tried to hammer out a scenario. I pretty much used my Tegel Manor Dynasty setting I did in the pub game; basically a prequel to full blown haunted Tegel Manor. This setting is sort of turning out to be my Ravenloft, a recurring locale with undead, demonic forces, family intrigue, and atmosphere. In a lot of ways I’m inspired by the old Dark Shadows program to give a living family angle to the cursed mansion.
with the love
Ten years ago, I had finished my college degree and was beginning my career. A career I wasn't sure I could handle. I had visions of Dead Poets Society dashed by my reality of lazy high schoolers who thought they could bully me and my standards down. Almost coming to a complete break-down by Christmas break, the school provided some time for me to get composure, and after a few extra weeks to recoup, those high schools realized that I wasn't changing my ways. We all survived, though I'd never want to relive that first year again.
And with a fading twilight,
Then I heard it. The familiar whooshing-whine of a business jet on its takeoff run. I laid down my tools and stood up to watch. The Hawker had already broken ground when it came into view. Gear up, it roared down the length of the runway, poking its nose skyward. It slowly climbed as it passed the airport’s resident red-tailed hawk that was gliding about the tempestuous sky. As the winged aluminum projectile slid away toward the horizon and its turbine’s fury faded, I had to smile. How many years have I been at this? How long ago was that first, now forgotten, takeoff observed? How many times have I stopped mid-task to witness another act of aviation? How many silhouettes have I squinted at droning over the backyard on a Saturday afternoon?
The flac version will follow at a later date.
“Well, I don’t know about that,” Guus said. “If I were you, I’d leave the empire like all the rest of the gilten. I mean, if I were me and I were a gilten that’s what I’d do.”
There also doesn't appear to be any advertising--which raises the question of how the new Poetry.com pays for itself, and what's in it for Newton Rhymes. A hint, possibly, can be found in the Privacy Policy (my bolding): "We will receive and store any information you enter on the Web Site or give us in any other way that personally identifies you...By submitting this personally identifiable information to us you agree to receive email and postal mail communication from us and our marketing partners." In other words, anyone who signs up for the new Poetry.com website should expect to be solicited.
And they have Gay Masses
In my travels I’ve stumbled across a lot of games systems that were horrible and a lot that were great but I’ve never had the chance to contribute to one. Hopefully that will change now, I’ve found one that’s open and in development http://thenexted.com/. I’ve designed races, classes, cultures, whole worlds and more but it’s all been homebrew stuff. Maybe I can finally make a contribution to something bigger?
Few are aware that the Signature loans are around to them. On the other hand, there’re wonderful which will get the bucks you will need close at hand and pay it off with your next payday.
Last year when I was buying them for the first time for Runwild's preschool party, I went to 4 different stores trying to find Valentine's with envelopes. I did not succeed. Apparently, you can only get the ones that fold and seal with a sticker. Blahh.
Elected unto God’s Favor in Justification!*The Reprobate is PREDESTINED** unto
The very essence of Christianity lies in just that position. I am speaking of the position of complete submission to Christ. That is what we are called to. Andrew Murray says this in his book, Humility, “The creature has not only to look back to the origin and first beginning of existence, and acknowledge that it there owes everything to God; its chief care, its highest virtue, its only happiness, now and through all eternity, is to present itself an empty vessel, in which God can dwell and manifest His power and goodness.” This is simple Biblical truth.
become a mother,
Finally, as for the few scuffles and handbag swinging that went on, all I can say to that is, I hope none of you ever get too close to me at the January sales next year. Honestly, I've seen worse at the Debenham's sale.
Level 10: 20% chance to deal 125% damage after an attack.
That's essentially (in a nutshell) what people told me today when I posted a status on facebook about my battle with Virginia Unemployment. The only reason I applied for it was because of this handy website stating state statutes and legislation. I called the Veteran Affairs office to verify and they confirmed that federal funding should be made available for military spouses moving on PCS orders for the state I left. However, the Virginia Unemployment lady told me that source was not a reputable site.
NOW onto the musings of the day. This weekend was Earth Day... did you do anything to celebrate? Take your own bags to the grocery store? Go to a parade? Hug a tree?
I am happy and proud to report that I not only beat my challenges, but my weight loss as of April 6 was 14 pounds total…YES, 14 WHOLE POUNDS!! I am so proud of myself. That is nearly 1/4 of the weight that I want to lose! Yes!Mission Accomplished! I have to acknowledge each milestone or this journey will be brutal. Not only am I getting more fit and healthy, but I also feel soooooooooooo much better too. I was thrilled to see some slight definition in my biceps from my birthday photos. I am no Jillian Michaels…yet…but I am getting there FOR SURE!
The EPA has forbidden cruise ships and other large ocean-going vessels from dumping sewage within three miles of the California coast. And the Interior Department has banned uranium mining for 20 years on more than a million acres of public land surrounding Grand Canyon National Park. Also, the United States has become the first nation in the world to establish catch limits for every variety of fish it manages (46 varieties) in hopes of rebuilding depleted stocks.
God Is the Bigger Elvis
Women have the right to be informed of all the factors that COULD harm their pregnancy but they don't deserve to be humiliated, exposed, denigrated, or sacked if their informed choice leads them to do something the Govt and its pet smokerphobic extremists dislike.
"Well, I'm not really a worker, I'm more of a player."
Stamp the images for inside the basket onto a tag that you can pull up out of the basket to reveal the full image, peek-a-boo!
Love. At least, that’s what I’ve heard. You need to wait for it to find you or some other claptrap. It sneaks up on you unexpectedly, blah blah…Not today’s topic. So discuss that amongst yourselves.
Every time that Barkley appears on Dan Patrick or with Howard Eskin it’s a must listen for me. I’m very glad that the committee of voters got it right.
However, Moffat added that his ideas for 2013 are still at a very early stage of development.
Boxor HD – An original and beautiful DreamBoard theme.
Avarians are birdlike aliens who cannot fly unassisted. Slightly smaller than humans, they wear armor that will deflect stun beams (+5 to saves) and carry a laserblade equivalent to a +2 dagger. Avarians’ ranged weapons include a grenade rocket pack (six charges) capable of delivering a 100-yard blast equal to a 12-dice fireball out to a range of one mile (roll to hit as with a giant throwing a rock) and a wide dispersion blaster that does 1-10 points damage to any three targets within 5’ of one another.
here's the story: thursday is registration & technique boutique, trunk show then the welcome. after the welcome everyone is on their own until breakfast the next morning. which means the hotel restaurant is packed trying to feed all the women. there is nowhere close as far as food options & the resort is so far that nobody delivers - not even a pizza option. so, i ordered room service (since i had the baby) & it took well over a hour & was expensive. they had tres leches bread pudding - for a HUGE bread pudding fan, i was delighted. it was $9 plus the 3.50 delivery charge plus the 21% gratuity. but is was thinking it would be well worth it & a once in a lifetime thing. so, i ordered it after thinking for 2 seconds about it. it came. it was a huge disappointment. small. dry. fruity. not creamy. definitely not worth the $ but more than anything else a total pop in my balloon that had been so high & full.
Here he is taped with drafting tape (on the back) to a drawing board, I've started laying in some of the underlying colors of his coat. And yes I couldn't resist starting off on his big bunny-like ears.
The hayloft door, the 4X4 - they simulate a fist,
Same old scratching, same old ‘unt,
There are numerous re-enactors strolling about, including Dad’s Army characters. “Don’t panic, Mr Mainwaring!”, (they must have heard that said to them a hundred times!). One chap had original old coins and notes in his wallet.
Some upgrades can be so extreme that they no longer look like what they were initially set out to be.
The “modern era” began with the building of a dry dock at Mumbai (then Bombay) about 1750; a second was erected in Kolkatta about 1780. During the 19th century, the industry was in a period of expansion and prosperity. However, for the last 100 years, the yards have been in a general decline.
The sworn affidavit is expected to be filed at the court between Tuesday and Wednesday as Mr. Okah renews his bid to secure a bail after spending more than one year in a South African jail.
Your servant I remain, and humbly ask
We turned the corner to go by the minor league ballpark and Hill 1 appeared. I remembered it from the 2 half-marathons. It’s a LONG overpass. Which doesn’t sound bad. Until you are running it. I felt GREAT. I ran that entire hill without any real huffing and puffing. Huge ego boost.
Code is a translator for compressing/decompressing raw media data.
7. The Feeling of Jazz.
So once the medical check was done I mingled with my crew at the starting line before the mandatory meeting in the afternoon. This was the first time the nerves hit. Standing at the starting line of the most prestigious 100 mile race in the country. The emotions begin to flow. I trained so hard to get here. To finish this race would be the pinnacle of my athletic career!!
They are just too cute and the kids LOVE
Thanks for stopping by and please leave a comment. Anne :)
Psychology plays an important role in market levels and the technicals of the market tells us how the market “feels”. Volume has been higher on market down days than it has been on up days. We are mercenaries and paid to be neither bulls nor bears but on the right side of the market. Right now the volume and conviction stands with the bears. Are we in for a repeat of 2011? Higher market to start the year and stumble through the summer and early fall. We are watching intently the 1350 level on the S&P 500. The bulls need to hold the lows of April. If they do not hold investors sense of déjà vu may intensify. April is historically one of the strongest months of the year and its weakness may portend greater weakness ahead. Professional investors may seek to harvest some gains of the strong start to the year and batten down the hatches for summer. If we hold we could consolidate and move higher still but corporate earnings will have to cooperate.
This is actually something I’ve spotted more frequently in food magazines; I’m not sure if they were perhaps trying to put across the impression of satiety after a good meal and a bottle of wine, but it just makes me feel like they don’t want me to see something. And queasy.
Current Weight: 203.8
It burns and freezes all at the same time.
Bruce Reitherman … Mowgli
I'm sure she finds them a real rock.
SanJAsKa: So will many on your world at this time dear Wesley. Indeed, have many of you not noticed that lately you are in fact butting heads with your own doubts about ascension and about us? You Live on a world where you are taught to believe that we do not exist, that Logos energy is simply an idea and that your society will sooner destroy itself rather than ascend. With how tight the chains of manipulation are kept on your world, it is not surprising that many who have awakened do still in fact have doubts about ascension and about us. It is normal, and it is to be expected. We, having a higher perspective can see the blocks of energy that still hold many of you back. We can see the doubt that many of you do not even realize you still carry, and we have been busier than ever trying to help you smooth out those blocks so you can be the Divine service to Earth and all upon Her that you all truly are.
Gristle and rind, and a roarers' life,
Peach
The light is crappy in the den in the mornings right now.
I am also thankful for Heather, whom I can call, email, or FB message about any question, big or small. She has been an amazing support system for Sofi and me, and I don’t know how I could have done it this time around without her. She has made me a much better doggy mommy and has become a friend. She is one of the most nurturing people I know, and a true example of someone who gives of themselves for others. She’s the best!
And, in case you are beginning to think I am in some way related to Stephen Fry because of all these wonderful words I know, I confess a friend bought me a copy of a little book called Foyle’s Philavery – a treasury of unusual words (collected by Christopher Foyle). And it certainly is what it says on the cover.
And if you haven't visited:
That’s pretty bad, and although most appliances here will run fine on low voltage, that’s pushing it a bit. So, I use these Stavols to raise the voltage back up to 240V on anything we care about to make sure that it doesn’t break.
Heather Draper – Is it terrible to dream of my own show??? Well really, I am just so passionate about what I do and I do love sharing that with others..any opportunity to do that is something I look forward to..though I often wish I could have a body double!!
You’re in love,
Before I go any further let me take a moment to say “Everything that happens to a believer is either caused or allowed by God”.
*The "big move" meant leaving behind my beloved standing mixer, so for now I'm hand kneading and mixing. I will still include the directions for using a standing mixer, though. Let's face it, it can be done by hand but it's way easier with a mixer!
the world stopped spinning around me and i just stared at him in shock. then i ran over to him to hug him and accidentally stepped on his toes (i tend to be rather clumsy). he didn’t even flinch even though he was barefoot and i had my house-shoes on, but just smiled and let me give him a hug.
That makes the C.J. Wilson signing that much more logical. With a rotation of Jered Weaver, Dan Haren, C.J. Wilson and Ervin Santana as your #4 starter, it’s exciting for the Angels and their fans. It instantly becomes the best pitching staff in the AL, with the possible exception of the Mariners.
The desperation that I used to have each time I try to make you happy
For well over a year I have been planning to make gozlemes. I'm not sure why I put of making them. I think perhaps it is the thought of rolling that dough out so thin, but really they are cheap and easy and oh so yummy so I really must get onto this. I'm sure my daughter would enjoy helping with these and I stumbled upon a recipe in a magazine today so it must be a sign from the universe.
Okies. Catch you good folks later. :D
BridgePort was in last year's list but axed this year, and Widmer was axed a couple years ago--both owing to definitions about ownership. You also shouldn't jump to the conclusion that a fall in position equals a fall in barrelage--it may mean a brewery like Full Sail just didn't grow as fast as others.
today in the wide world of sport. The Yolk will bring daily posts and weekly
(Belgian-style dark strong ale)-Aged for 6 months in oak with 3 strains of Brettanomyces sp. giving characteristics of leather, fig, oak, tobacco, cherry, and subtle earthy horse blanket. 9.4%
7. Provide on-shift and off-shift support for client Java applications.
The extraordinary measure comes in the wake of Prime Minister Gillard’s defence of the HSU insisting that the independent body Fair Work Australia should be allowed to complete its investigation into the scandal ridden union without any sort of political interference.
The QueryPolice won't show up at your house. Agents will still glance at your query, BUT it's REALLY hard to read, even on a computer screen. A LOT of agents are reading on their iphones and smaller screens.
I do however find my crystal source for my shoes! And re-discovered a really nice pair of Stuart Weitzman black heels (with a tiny platform) that I never wear. Soooo, I’m excited! I’ve ordered crystal AB, light rose, jonquil AB, a really pretty green, and a red. So, when I am done, I’ll have several pairs of stressed shoes!!
This is a statement freighted with assumptions – first and foremost that people are aware of Salt’s books in the first place. According to the Salt Confidential blog, Chris Hamilton-Emery has been humbled by discovering just how little awareness there is of Salt outside those with a real commitment to poetry. It is evident that for all of their Facebooking and assorted innovations, Salt have remained outside of the mainstream and consequently many active book buyers remain unaware of their lists. The reasons for this are too diverse and numerous to enumerate here. Now the real crux of the matter is that the exposure the Just One Book Campaign grants them will get books and authors into new hands, or rather in front of new eyeballs. Ergo we will soon see whether Salt are publishing books people want to read if – after Just One Book – sales can be sustained at significantly higher levels than before the campaign. If not, maybe it tells us something that we don’t really want to know.
Yeah, spontaneous levitation will do that.
addictive (all other crafts are now gathering dust!), and I set up my
the last light of honey
To which I responded: “But it’s such tiny little land.” Or some such nonsense. Note to self: England is bigger than the 1-inch square on the globe in your living room.
It’s that time. I’m giving away free (digital) copies of Nails Jane in exchange for Amazon reviews. I have a .pdf version and a .mobi version. But remember, I can’t send you the book unless you email me and ask for it.
Daily Dispatch Correspondent and Sapa
Tøggle – Leveled my Gnome Warrior from 28 to 30, without BoAs. Tøggle I am leveling as Arms.
Craig Simon – Craig is the Managing Director of Purple Learning, and he knows his stuff when it comes to engaging e-learning. He has recently started to share his wisdom via the Purple Blog.
Today we’ll follow-up yesterday’s post with links to the articles on all of the major league news that came out of the Mariners Pre-Spring Training Media Luncheon yesterday.
But have you looked more deeply into the psychological effects certain colours are supposed to have on us?
Let's get this show on the road now shall we?
The weather was thick on the coast last night, not only interfering, it is believed, with. the wireless communication, from the liner to Sable island, but probably with its rate of progress to New-York, whither it is heading.
actually seen, face to face,
And while I sat in my backyard... just sitting... I had the biggest smile on my face. I'm so happy you guys. I love this job. I love the actual work, the people, the responsibility, the subpoena power, the places it will take me whenever (if ever) I'm ready to leave. But more than that, I love the schedule. I love getting to work at 8 and leaving at 4:30. I love that I pull in the driveway, kids in tow, at 5:00. I love that we can splash in the pool for 15 minutes before I remember to stick dinner in the oven and we're still eating by 6:00. I love dog-piling in Landon's bed, tickling and cuddling and singing and reading every single book requested because it's only 6:45 and we have time to waste. I love that when they're tucked in, the evening is mine. I love that I've never looked at my blackberry after hours. I knew this would be a good move for my family, but a reality without blackberries cannot really be understood until it is lived. We were happy and we were fine while I was at the firm, but in spite of the move and unpacking and the overwhelming number of acronyms and systems and names I've had to learn, the past three weeks have been some of the happiest, easiest, lightest days I've spent in a long while. I'm so glad we're here.
And Green said, Nor do I!
Thinly slice peeled and cored apples, put into a pot with sugar, add 2-3 tbsp water and cook on low heat until apples are cooked into thick jam.
We did and died like lions, to keep ourselves in chains,
Our first garden went into the ground in 2009. We didn’t till; tomatoes and peppers went directly from seedling containers to the rock-hard former cow pasture. Our yield was decent enough considering the lack of preparation. A couple times that summer, I cleared the weeds from around the plants — and found long-dormant muscles I hadn’t been stretching.
Juan Williams did agree with O’Liely that there is a ‘Muslim-Problem’. Williams began his explanation with “Look, Bill, I’m not a bigot...” You only have to explain yourself like this when you are saying something that a bigot would say. Why else would you have to clarify who you are? It’s as if you are really saying: “Yes, I know bigots say this and think this way. I’m no bigot. I just agree with bigots on this point.”
Little forest is now left in Sabah. More and more of it is being currently earmarked for “industrial timber production” and oil palm plantation by Musa Aman’s government. The latest ploy, spearheaded by Musa is so-called ‘mosaic planting’ a scheme to clear fell forest in Natural Forest Management areas. Critics say it is just another method for grabbing the timber from areas that should be protected.
By the end of Monday, I was a little ahead of target, on around 2,500 words. So far so good, I thought.
As they drove down the main street of Peterborough they caused about 6 accidents.
Everything Flows – Teenage Fanclub
And you’re all alone,
No matter where you are in the course of your career you get this question. Unless of course you are super well known then you might get a pass…might. I have a feeling if the President of theUnited Stateswas dressed down in a baseball cap and shades making small talk over coffee without secret service he too may get the very same question.
Woods made sure the argument was loud enough for the boat captain to hear and made sure both Wagner and Walken were quite drunk. After the argument subsided, Wood went to her state-room as well Wagner and Walken to theirs. Later that evening, Wood returned on deck, unhooked the dingy that was knocking against the state-room walls, removed an inflatable rescue raft and disembarked the yacht navigating away from the Splendour and went to shore. Arrangements were already made onshore with a close friend for a getaway car and enough funds to start a new life.
Below are a few taster photos of the complete sequence, which can be found by following the links at the end of this post to my Facebook or Flickr albums.
Or don't you at least envision zipping around the island in an economy car? That awesome Ford Focus that was the cheapest thing to get off the lot? I mean, hey - if it takes you from point A to point B, and in you're in HAWAII, does it really matter? It's good on gas, it's easy to park... of course it doesn't matter.
A positive sunbeam smiling here
Again and again last night: when pain and depression came, there was this Loving Voice asking, “and could you just let that be as it is – for now?”
Mardi Gras has been celebrated since the middle ages.
This will require you having a familiarity with how long it takes you to get from one Eclipse to the next so that you’re not re-applying unnecessarily. You can calculate cast times, but your best bet is to go out there and practice with it until you can reasonably predict it 90% of the time.
Although the French eventually took over Mexico, six years later, thanks in part to military support and political pressure from the United States, France was forced to withdraw.
This is all the result of fraudulent financial practices, banks cooking the books, exotic and dangerous financial instruments all combined with bread and circus politics and being addicted to a higher standard of living than we can afford (for far too long). Now the creditors have run out of patience. Living via a Ponzi scheme of eternally refinanced debt and pork barrel politics cannot continue indefinitely. Remember Ponzi was sent to prison and died a pauper. Our unelected European bureaucrats live lives of luxury at taxpayers’ expense for doing exactly the same thing as Ponzi and Bernie Madoff.
Unfortunately there are pubs around that are not rough pubs. These types of pubs think they can tell me what to wear and think they are doing people a favour by allowing people in to spend their own hard earned money.
I took on this room as well as my kitchen I was on a roll with this reorganising bug. I made sure that I didn't spend too long doing each task because you can get overwhelmed. My aim was one cupboard a week.
Let me know if you're learning along with these tutorials, it's fun for me to know and add pictures to the Lily's Quilts Flickr group so I can see what you're doing!
After racking off a gallon of wort from my San Diego Session Saison I pitched the whole starter. I had strong activity by morning. The wort was pitched in the low 70s and the ambient temperatures was in the low to mid 70s. I know that this yeast likes some heat so I found my old aquarium heater and made a nice warm bath. I had to keep adjusting the knob to get the right temperature. It worked pretty well and kept the wort near 80F for another couple weeks. I read that this yeast can take a while so I gave it plenty of time.
One can scarcely blame them for so doing. Apartheid in any form is a wretched and dehumanized business, but the point is that it is also tragic to see the achievements of the civil rights movement have now been turned so topsy-turvy that claim to minority racial status is a way to attain privileges not necessarily earned nor merited. It is sad to see so much pretending and fakery substituted for the American ladder of opportunity. Too many are, yes, great pretenders.
...is my first apartment.
And speaking of Brutal...
Wowie Zowie!
If you want to double the recipe, Use the measurements below:
On a certain night
Rm
The difference with teen peer pressure is that we tend to care about peer pressure only from our group. As an adult that means a few very homogenous communities: work, neighbourhood, maybe church. As a teen, that's a school full of different groups, and diverse people.
Hello Loves!
We recently released our first independent project, a quirky piece about a middle school student council election. “The Council” follows three eighth-graders as they navigate their way through the challenging landscape of middle school politics. The idea came from the flood of election coverage we’re all experiencing this year.
The 6-month and 1-year forward premium closed at 6.08% and 5.21% respectively against 6.11% and 5.28% yesterday.
It appears that the enrolment agencies just clicked a photograph and did not ensure that the fingerprints were scanned. A local UID official confirms this.
or yellow and gray pillows in an all-white room...
Black Pudding just shook his old head in despair before glancing towards Moon.
Me: "Sounds good, Les. But make sure you make them as nerdy as possible. No personalities- just straight nerd. Remember Urkel from Family Matters? Like that, but less realistic. Throw in a bimbo across the hall and a couple of running jokes and you've got yourself a show."
Do you not believe that I am in the Father and the Father is in me? The words that I speak to you I do not speak on my own. The Father who dwells in me is doing his works.
Summit Brewing Company Summit India Pale Ale
You're not sure how to react to that sort of introduction, but you're each choosing guests for your wedding party and you want to be fair, so you go along with the suggested invitation for someone you've never met.
OH, LAURA?!?!?!
Transfer mixture to a bowl, and beat in all but one egg, 1 at a time, beating well after each addition (You can use a mixer for this, but a wooden spoon works fine). Batter should be stiff enough to just hold soft peaks and fall softly from a spoon. If batter is too stiff, in a small bowl beat remaining egg lightly and beat into batter a little at a time, until batter is desired consistency.
And participate in the Eternal Dance of Joy and Suffering
Not surprisingly, the best part of graduating, says Peter, is “I feel like I can finally sleep more than eight hours and not regret it. I can finally take everything that I have learned and use it to make a lasting difference.” The worst part is “leaving a family of some of the most caring and innovative students, friends and faculty I have ever had,” he writes.
I couldn't fit the entire other side in the picture, but it says "I heart Taiwan" (the green picture is Taiwan). I was pretty impressed with the ornament considering that my painted pottery NEVER turns out as well as you think it will.
On the other side of the puddle the capacity for a long, hot violent summer is unfolding; Occupy is present in London, of course, warming up for the London Olympics. This time last year, demonstrators were burning down houses in scenes reminiscent of the Blitz. The financial crisis on the continent has manifested street violence to the point where politics-as-usual in Italy and Greece has simply ceased to exist.
What do you think about Land's End new "terrain Mary Janes"?
Today I woke up with really mixed up feelings about a lot of things. First off I wondered if I hurt anyone's feelings this week. My circle of friends is important to me and the last thing I want to do is hurt them but sometimes we protect our heart so much that it is inevitable to hurt others, unknowingly. If I did, I hope they'll forgive me, my heart is a little achy these days. I'll explain why.
82 at
I stood there in the night, lonesome, longing
Just dying to read the finished book, now, aren’t ya? Someday, my friends; someday…
The six plants will be, Boxwood, Hydrangeas, Roses, a Crab Apple Tree, Lavender, and Ornamental Grasses. OK, onto the first house...........
Fragile – I am really sensitive. I wish I wasn’t so sensitive.. but I will get upset about such small things, and then try really hard pretending I am not upset.
we had a couple of drinks,
Loved to create background using stamps. I love this set. Have you noticed that the colours are pastels? Very unusual for me to use pastels. Love it though. Hope you do too.
Anyway, the photos aren't the only thing lacking from this report. I'd really like to say that I was thrilled with my race performance but, in actuality, I'm not. I mean, sure, it's technically a PR since I've never run a 4 mile race before but I really wanted to do better than I did.
My films can be self absorbed, pretentious, sometimes misguided, they may run free with little regard for the audiences sensibilities but the audience is superfluous I make these worlds for me. Someone out there will hear me. And that would be fine. But the music I make the worlds I create are for my mind. I invite you to stay tuned... or go fuck yourself either way I'm satisfied.
For most people, high school isn’t ever quite the same as we imagine it. It certainly isn’t for Jane Retton…which is why she fakes her diary. Instead of writing about her so-so blah everyday life, Jane writes about the kind of things that she wishes happened. And it’s no big deal, because no one’s going to read her diary. At least, no one is supposed to… In a mad rush, Jane accidently brings her diary to school with her. And out of spite, someone shares Jane’s diary with the entire school—In particular, the last entry. And everyone believes it’s true. After all, it’s Jane’s diary, Jane’s handwriting. And even though hardly any of it IS true, Jane’s boyfriend certainly isn’t denying it.
"Why is he using the ticket thing for the semis?"
_____________________________________________________________
The 4 week average of the TSP bull ratio (shown above) has also declined to levels that would suggest a significant low is in order.
The discussions, questions and conversations which these meetings involved were, I hope useful for the relatives of the deceased, and certainly seemed to play a role in clearing up any misunderstandings, and allowed a chance to discuss events with less urgency than when their loved one remained alive but very ill.
"The grenades are still in production," he said.
I am now chatting with Jessica. Jessica is such a cute name. I wonder what her real name is? I find that Customer Support personnel usually have a real name and a name they use when providing support. Alas, Jessica cannot help me, since the program locks up once you start a chat session. She referred me to telephone support, which I just called and found the wait for telephone payroll support is one hour!
The first part in our series of articles showed where the Philippines gets its energy, where it goes, and why we need to wean ourselves off of fossil fuels as soon as possible. For Part 2, we’re sharing some handy tips on what you can do in your homes to decrease your energy use. Remember: less energy used = more financial savings = less pollution and carbon dioxide. Everybody wins!
No one really knows what will happen to Sirkus but Sigga says she will serve the final round in the beginning of February. When asked about the next step she replies: “I will just play it by ear. Whatever happens, happens.”
But the joy quickly turned into panic as the fireball disappeared from the sky and they noticed that everything had turned pitch black for as far as the eye could see. Iran knew full well that their missiles couldn’t penetrated the west’s missile defense systems so they devised a clever scheme to not only take out the defense systems, but to take out the power grid and all electronic equipment in locations were the missile defense systems were located.
The education advocacy group founded by former Washington, D.C., Schools Chancellor Michelle Rhee will set up shop in Missouri this winter seeking to help pass laws affecting public education.
There was nothing wrong with his hearing though. As Rel's footsteps rang back from the chasm, Rissad twisted to look over his shoulder, then rolled onto his back with a cough that turned into a moan. The lie of his right arm betrayed his broken collarbone; an uninjured man only lay like that when pressed up hard against a wall. One side of his face was yellow-brown with the remnants of a bruise.
And then, after a couple hours, she brings her son down from upstairs, sits him across from me, brings us some tea, and attempts to start a friendship.
Fujimoto is an ikigami messenger with misgivings. While it may seem like this method works, sometimes, it also seems like it doesn’t alleviate problems as much as it should (violence and suicides are still prevalent). However, if people try to question the government’s methods, they are labeled social miscreants and may be injected with instant death capsules. If one knows of a person who may be a miscreant and doesn’t report them, then they are a miscreant by association and face the same punishment. Fujimoto finds himself questioning the government’s methods and occasionally ends up tentatively toeing the line in efforts to help the people he sentences to death.
The Best Short Stories of Mark Twain
This song always brings to mind Roy North singing Earl's A Winger on Get It Together. This is the second week running I've mentioned Roy North on this blog. Whoever would've thought that'd happen, way back when I launched it?
Instead of pastry, it has a chocolate shell (I love chocolate!). Inside, it's filled with almond hazelnut praline, ground coarsely so there's a little crunch (crunchy praline? Yum!). With Cluizel's quality, it's formidable.
At WonderCon yesterday, we learned that Carol Danvers is facing a very different future. Carol Danvers is becoming Captain Marvel after Avengers Vs. X-Men. With an entirely new costume and haircut.
I started out by heat embossing and fussy-cutting 2 peacocks. I then tried to figure out how to use them on cards.
There's a lovely welcoming reception 1/2 hour before dinner is served where we were greeted with a glass or wine or beer. Everyone is chatting, getting to know one another, getting to learn more about Ryan and Jen and the upcoming Staplehouse. Then we're ushered into the dinning room where there are six seats at the dinning room table and four at the bar (for those who would like to watch the chef work his magic in the open kitchen). Jen is the ultimate hostess and server, as she always served the women first. And Ryan is the passionate chef who described each course with the most descriptive and appetizing words before we literally started to dig in with our "ooohhhhss" and "aaahhhhss", giving repetative compliments to the chef.
These showed highly attenuated Th1 and Th17 immune responses in CFS. High Th2 marker expression but weak interaction patterns pointed to an established Th2 inflammatory milieu. Similarly, altered associations in CFS provided indirect evidence of diminished NK cell responsiveness to IL-12 and LT-α stimulus.
it is always rainy when we get here
Born: April 15, 1931 in Strawberry Plains, TN
Then he takes the chalice and says quietly:
November 9-10
(iv) Quantization
Abby and E had their bath and had a lot of fun playing. I got both girls out and dried. Abby said she needed to go potty, so while she did that, I went to go get E dressed for bed.
Since I've been home for the last 6 months, I have been doing a lot of cooking and baking. Back in February I baked 124 cupcakes for a family friends birthday party. They were a big hit and people were asking for my business cards, to which I have none of, so I had to give out my other business cards and put "cupcakes" at the top.
The menu said it was seasonal so you need to go try that one out before they rid of it! They use cucumber vodka and a dash of sour with muddled watermelon. So delicious!
Also for rain catchment! You have to be careful with water-catching though- don’t use it for leafy green veggies or strawberries, etc. That water should go nowhere near anything that is going in your mouth due to possible E coli from bird doo on the roof! So we use it for non-edible plants and tree watering.
5. Good quality sea salt contains many essential minerals for the body. The best type of sea salt should be slightly wet from the sea it was taken from.
we have tried putting them over the fence next door but they just climb back over again. this one is the small one the other is quite a bit bigger. when Sally Girl fist found it we didnt know what it was at first cause it was in the bushes & when it kind of jumped up & out i first thought it was a snake but thank goodness it wasn't or it would have bitten my Sally Girl. snakes are the only thing i am frightened of & im always on the look out. for anyone who does not live in Australia we have the most poisonous snakes in the word oh & spiders.
46. Famous names from Scottish literature include: Sir Walter Scott,Lord Byron and Sir Arthur Conan Doyle.
You anti-Whites ONLY ever argue for this to be done to EVERY White country and ONLY White countries. You are demanding and justifying the GENOCIDE of my people.
That flannelette shirt is so daggy; why don't you update your wardrobe ?
Don't forget to check out what other stamper's have made with this sketch with the blog hop!
Paul, the most seasoned of travellers never spoke or wrote of the many places he had seen. These included Athens, Ephesus and all points between. Now he was on his way to Rome, the political and economic centre of the then known world.
I predicted the worst for our bitter rivals Twitch FC but they didn’t get what I wanted….they got “it” all the same. Barcelona would have mutilated Twitch FC convincingly but I believe that Real Madrid will be too much for them. This season scripts have been torn and rewritten. I’m in no fucking mood to see an upset. So CR7 and co….you know what to do. I’ll certainly love to see Gomes concede a 40-yard free kick like our dear ol’ Almunia.
Directions: Spoon yogurt into serving dish. Add sweetener, maple or vanilla extract and stir to combine. Add fruit, granola and nuts to top (can be stirred in if desired).
Tu Solo TuI
The King’s Speech – Out now (Limited)
Okay, not all, it's just a REALLY sharp design - no stock photo boy body to ogle (and some of you may be grieving over that, so sorry), no attempt at the mer-tail, nothing but the water and the trident - and its sharpness and the glint of light from the tip remind us that it's not just something that Poseidon holds - it's a weapon, and a freakin' effective one, at that. The rough edging of the title font against the backdrop of the roiling waters let the reader know that Something Is At Stake. It's not all eye-candy and lifeguards around here.
After a year and a half, my first book reached around 191 in the rankings (out of tens of thousands of books on there). My second book has reached 84 after just over one month! If you like thrillers and/or science fiction, perhaps check it out!
All the large towns hold one and we ventured in to Aix-en-Provence to enjoy their version in early April. We arrived about half an hour early to find a nice spot on the Cours Mirabeau, electing to camp on the grass around the Rotonde fountain at the head of the street.
I could not discern wether my desire to lay a snow angel before his stone stemmed from how it felt or how it sounded, so I walked on.
Alright everyone, I’m about to call it a night…
“We should have another chair in the sitting room at the very least.”
Why did you leave the order of cherubim,
For years, cats have found their way to Chez Medlock.
Today I'm continuing with my French Week in celebration of a whole bunch of recent and future events, one being featured at the 'The Decorating Forum' this week. Once again thanks to Julie-Ann and all the readers who nominated my blog and a big welcome to my new readers. If you are just tuning in with me this week, I am also holding a photo-art print giveaway. More on that at the end of this post, but first a little blurb on my photo-art above;
On the second day of Mr Coulson’s testimony, Mr Sheridan asked him if the NotW had made payments to Mr Mulcaire and Mr Goodman after their release from prison. Mr Coulson stated that this had happened after he had left the NotW and he had “no knowledge” about any payments.
I do like Joe Haldeman’s Forever trilogy – Forever War especially was a very interesting read, especially in context with Starship Troopers (the book) which was written at a similar time. And then of course Forever Peace‘s “What the Bitch?” ending was actually pretty funny… Forever Free though I just couldn’t get into. It was set in the same ‘universe’ as the first two books, but it was more about setting the scene for certain events and people that you encounter within the first book, and it just felt really disjointed and stand-alone – there’s barely any mention to the ‘Forever War’, despite the fact that it’s supposed to be raging across the cosmos at the time. Anyway, enough of that – I have an announcement to make:
7. The Giver -Lowry (1993)
Now I know that I showed you some great hallway examples not so long ago, but I couldn’t resist blogging about this little beauty. Taken from one of our upcoming homes in the June issue of 25 Beautiful Homes (on sale 3rd May – don’t miss it!), I think it’s a great example of how you can make the most of a small space.
free LifeMag Blogger Template is a quality and free premium style blogger
I quickly realized my error. I put my back into it. I sorta figured the popping noises probably were not a sign that this was going to end well for me. The voice of my husband was resounding inside my head and he sounded a lot like a nagging personal trainer, "Lift with your legs! Lift with your legs!" This time, I squatted down. Somehow or another, I got a 100 pound bag of sand, stuffed into a 50 pound bag. I am sure of it. I told myself that I could do it, out loud, and people in the parking lot surely thought I was NUTS. I wrestled the bag into the van.
Elswick Park was given to the Newcastle Corporation to prevent the area being developed as housing. In 1975 the land surrounding the park began to be re-developed, and in 1981 work on the Swimming Pool was completed on the site of the old hall.
She set to work, pulling and prodding that window open.
He's a handsome fellow, but, for some reason, I have never named him. Maybe it's because he's so shy, that I can't get an idea of his personality. I've never been able to get a good picture of him, but, yesterday, I took some time, and went out to the patio, just to sit and watch. I had my camera with me, and I was very glad that I did, because, suddenly, I saw him crossing the lawn. I was hidden by some tall mums, and I don't think he saw me. He sat in the lawn, watching for a while, and I was able to get some good shots of him. Quite the handsome fellow, I think.
Psalm 42:11 Why art thou cast down, O my soul? and why art thou disquieted within me? hope thou in God: for I shall yet praise Him, who is the health of my countenance, and my God.
Bipolar disorder is a mental disorder that causes one to go through extreme manic and depressive episodes. In addition to these mood swings, one can also experience hallucinations or delusions.
with a knife and five cranberries.
Is it because of their connectedness to the land and each other that they don't need to have a word for BLISS?
Now that I bartend in a restaurant, I just tell my customers that it is against company policy for me to drink on the clock. I thank them profusely for the offer and then blame the no-drinking policy on the bosses. If the customer pushes back, I say something along the lines of "Hey, you don't want me to lose my job, do you?" while flashing them a big, fat smile. That usually does the trick and they stop trying to make me feel guilty for not accepting their drink offer.
With all the craziness I also didn't have time to shop, online or otherwise, this week. I was very sad this week to hear that my favorite local quilt shop is closing. When I told my husband, he said he was shocked they were closing their doors, after all, hadn't I been keeping them in business all these years? (He thinks he's so funny...) If you are lucky enough to have a local quilt store that you love, please try to shop there whenever you can! I can't say how sad I am that I won't be able to go there when I have a few extra minutes on a Saturday to browse. It was my favorite thing to do when the hubby was home and the boys were napping. :(
1 disk of your favorite pie crust (I do an all butter version)
After I won the trial, with the time before she was evicted running out she started a variety of threats and claims she wouldn't move out no matter what - she'd sued the association, the lawyers everybody. She'd kill everybody, she had powerful friends that would ruin us all ..... That certainly put us in a receptive frame of mind, now didn't it?
Admiral Kolumbus was a drunk; he knew that he had no chance of winning the America's Cup. And he knew that the Red Bull Flugtag was for hippies - he was an admiral! He had no time for hippies, even if he had a drug problem and lack of ambition himself. He knew that discovering a new country would be difficult. But given his options, it seemed like the one he would most likely be able to complete. And so he set forth from Ostrava in four vessels - the Nela, the Fanta, the Santa Meringue, and Russel - very hard going considering that Ostrava borders no sea or river. But just as he reached the Czech Republic/Germany border, he received word from King Prcrztnate. "Wait!"
Bruno Senna: It has been a disappointing weekend for me on the whole. It was difficult to overtake at the beginning of the race and then Schumacher got a big DRS boost coming down the straight and went into the back of me. These weekends with lots of bad luck happen sometimes, but on the up side our car has shown excellent pace with Pastor’s win. I am really happy for him and this will give the team a big boost headed into the next race.
And I got these answers regardless where and with whom I tried this exercise. I did it on a sales training with financial services company employees, I proposed it to a group of Real-Estate professionals in a networking event, I asked some university students in a leadership event. Apparently, regardless of our culture, country, education level, we all remember that at some point in our life we were told the same things. Be careful where you speak, when and what you speak, and to whom you speak.
The exact phrase the dreadlocked guy standing behind me yelled at his bearded friend was, “You’ve already touched at least one man’s hiney tonight, I know!”
At this point I’m thinking “maybe everybody else knows this and I’m the only one who doesn’t”… but a part of me is still sceptical. It sounds like some kind of an elaborate prank. Well I guess this is real.
I tell you, Golden Retrievers are just born gentlemen.
Be sure to let me know what you thought of todays post? Do you like it? Do you want me to do more single item themed posts? Should I go back to my usual style? Comment to give your opinion! Every opinion counts!
However, over the years, I've gradually cottoned-on to what it means for a beer to be creamy, and Purity's Pure Ubu is as good a candidate as any to demonstrate why 'creaminess' in an ale can be a very wonderful thing.
The other groups which came were relatively tiny. The Jewish population of Britain is often used as an example of immigrants to our country, ignoring the fact that Jewishness in itself is not an ethnicity. There have certainly been Jews in this country for at least 1,000 years, give or take three centuries of expulsion, however, the numbers involved were relatively small, sixteen thousand souls when they were expelled in 1290 . Even today, despite being resident for over ten centuries and including those Polish and Lithuanian Jews who are alleged to have arrived in such multitudes in the 19th Century, their numbers do not even match one tenth of the current official Asian population (let alone the real Asian population) and the Asians have only been coming here in significant numbers for the last forty to fifty years.
Water and oil do not weight the same - oil is lighter, which is why oil floats on water. If you pour one litre of water into a jug and one litre of oil into a similar jug, the oil would weigh less than the water. Therefore if you pour one litre of oil into a one litre jug and think it's the same as 1000 grams, it's not. You must weigh your oil to get exactly the 1000 grams needed in this recipe.
She turned around and looked at us.
i am a perpetual project starter, not so much a finisher.
That’s like saying that because your daddy never hugged you or said, “I love you,” that it excuses you from shouting hateful things at people on the street. Get real. If you have a real reason to be shouting than do that, but quit pretending that you are just damaged goods.
2: Other Peoples Behaviour
Do you notice the “Addins” drop down menu? All that crazy punctuation and code isn’t anything I have to worry about – I just need to chose the placement and what I want from the Addins menu (you can see I wanted the default image for the post, the post title and of course, the url for it), hone the text (which is what is outside of the punctuation, in this case “new entry on the blog”) and then add it to my tasks. Done!
Jesus let him have it. He said, “You follow all the requirements of The Book of Religious Institution Rules. You make sure you stay inside all the lines so no one can come after you. Yes, you look perfect from the outside. That Book protects you completely.
Skye Boat Song
Write/Consider
Rachel Kramer Bussel: a New York-based author, editor, blogger and event organizer. Rachel has contributed to 100+ anthologies, edited 40+ anthologies and is Senior Editor at Penthouse Variations. She has written for numerous publications, including Alternative Press, CNN.com, The Daily Beast, The Frisky, Gothamist, The Hairpin, Huffington Post, Jezebel, Lemondrop, Mediabistro, The Nervous Breakdown, New York Post, New York Press, Playgirl, Salon, San Francisco Chronicle, Time Out New York, The Village Voice, xoJane and Zink.
Due to major campus construction projects, we strongly recommend early arrival to ensure desired parking. Parking is available in the Airport and Motorcycle lots. Campus shuttles will be available to transport guests with difficulty walking to the Quad.
In 1934, Seth covered the S.S. Morro Castle ocean liner fire. The disaster that resulted in dead bodies washing up on the New Jersey shore would make headlines around the world. Then there was the Hindenburg disaster, this time in Lakehurst, New Jersey in 1937. Once again, Seth was on the scene and described the horrific carnage created by the hydrogen dirigible exploding and being totally consumed in just 33 seconds. The image of people jumping to their deaths and being burned alive, 36 victims in all, left its mark on the 28-year old reporter. But it was an entirely different and much more light-hearted exclusive that same year which would stick in Seth’s memory for the rest of his life.
However, I also had a coupon for $1.00 off four cans, meaning each dropped to $0.75. What would have been a $7.56 spending spree became a $3.00 bargain. I saved 60% off the usual price.
I arranged cities.
The two-week Confederations Cup, featuring the world champions, six continental champions and hosts South Africa, is a test event for the World Cup.
‘Put your sweater on; don’t you think I know when you are cold?’
We entered the Alzheimer’s ward–Alzheimer was out, so he spoke to the nurse on duty.
and have a hamburger and a malted and buy
I know nothing about Ray Hudson and the Western Rhythmaires other than what I can see at Terry E Gordon's great Rockin' Country Style website (thanks for the label shot). He had two singles on the legendary Starday-Dixie label, the first one, The Blues Walked Away being a favourite on the rockin' scene. That came out on Dixie 45-819 in late 1959, a full four years before his next effort.
GINGRICH: You know, I have participated in the two largest Republican sweeps in modern time, 1980, in the Reagan campaign, and 1994, with the Contract with America, which had the largest one-party increase in American history, 9 million extra votes.
EXTRAS: A
How cool is this? A high-end makeup brush in the box. It feels so soft, I don't have any other brushes this soft! And the handle feels really cool too. It feels expensive, you know? Haha!
(P.S. In case you didn't get a chance to get in on the subscriptions, make sure to add your name to the wait list for when she opens up new subscriptions!)
And yet here I am today, doing exactly that which at one time seemed unthinkable to me.
That Megan, she's a keeper.
Leah Bolger and David Swanson, Reader Supported News
The mall we visited the most was Tunjungan Plaza since the hotel had a shuttle service that took us there. It is very close to the Marriot and on a couple of occasions we walked there. We spent most of our time at Stingers, a game area with an indoor playground on the 5th floor and at the play area in the basement of the mall.
Big con: The third book is not out!!!!!!
Him: Sounds good. I trust Carissa. She's a sensible girl. I think it's wise that we gradually introduce her to alcohol so she doesn't feel the need to sneak it behind our back.
Rory McIlroy shot 1 under 71 and Tiger Woods finished with a pair of bogeys to shoot even par-72. The bogey on 18 was actually a good save after his tee shot went into the trees and resulted in an unplayable lie.Woods opened its rattling around in his first tee shot from a tree and put the second in the creek well to the left of the second fairway. He recovered pars on both and felt pretty decent for the round, all things considered.
When we arrived the man that worked there tried to lead us in the right direction because of our limited time, but when he asked what kind of apples we were looking for I hadn't really even thought about it. The true reason we had come wasn't even for the apples, it was for the life experience of picking the apples. I felt silly telling him that though, even though I shouldn't have. Life experiences with our families are really the only things that make up life. The apples will be eaten or rot, but the memories, traditions, and the pictures; they're going to last for forever.
It's not quite what you might think.
eatin' eatin' eatin' away at my personal time. yup. so, I was
You might say that, yes, I wrote a Super Bowl spot. But because of NBC, I never got it up.
The kids played in a ‘66-80-51’ formation (with 3 goalies), but it wasn't enough to win the game against the Athletic Bilbao, who by the way, won 5-3!
We are facing a true moral inversion – a system of moral understandings turned upside down. Where homosexuality was even recently condemned by the society, now it is considered a sin to believe that homosexuality is wrong in any way. A new sexual morality has replaced the old, and those who hold to the old morality are considered morally deficient. The new moral authorities have one central demand for the church: get with the new program.
I received this T-Shirt from Kerusso.com! Along with a "My Faithful Friends" puppy playset (for my daughter!) The T-Shirt says "I'm proud to be a Christian Mom
I know those examples are not as clever as the ones in Schmelling's piece. That's why I'm looking to you.
I’ve written a line, maybe one or two.
2003 – Amyotroph Lateral Scler Other Motor Neuron Disord – Letizia Mazzini and colleagues (Amyotroph Lateral Scler Other Motor Neuron Disord 2003; 4: 158—61) injected autologous bone-marrow-derived stem cells into the spinal cord of seven ALS patients. These investigators reported that the procedure had a reasonable margin of clinical safety. http://www.thelancet.com/journals/lancet/article/PIIS0140-6736%2804%2916634-8/fulltext
The problems came up in January when Penn State University was trying to make the final contract payment to the late coach's estate in exchange for a full release signed by the family. That showed that there is a lot of bad blood between Penn State and the Paterno family.
There are millions of planets and stars within this universe, yet this entire universe is only a small particle within the total creation. There are many universes like ours, and, as mentioned before, the spiritual sky is three times as large as the total material creation. In other words, three fourths of the total manifestation is in the spiritual sky.
The single serve packets are obviously great for enjoying tea on the go, but I'm afraid I just didn't care for the taste. I tried it cold and it was so-so. Not bad, not too astringent, but it just didn't taste like much of anything. I tried making it with a smaller amount of water, thinking perhaps the taste would develop, but that didn't work either. I tried the tea hot and got the faintest, merest hint of something reminiscent of a woodsy oolong, but that was it. Again, the flavor just wasn't there. While I rather like the idea behind this product, which would be especially useful while traveling, the flavor was a disappointment. If you've tried this new tea yourself, please let me know what you thought!
“Keep the Home Fires Burning,
If you really get into using baking soda for cleaning, consider buying it in bulk; see if you can join a co-op or if your local natural foods or bulk store can order it for you. After all, it doesn’t spoil, and the uses for baking soda are nearly endless!
In fall of 2008, pain reliever brand Motrin posted a short video as part of an ad campaign aimed at young mothers. In an attempt to identify with its intended audience, the ad featured a young woman speaking in an irreverent tone about the “fashion” of wearing one’s baby, and the back pain associated with the practice.
Anyway I will now climb down off my enormous soapbox just in time to tell you about the fab new challenge over at Totally Tilda. It's a super easy challenge we just want to see some form of stitching on your Tilda project.
Apologies, I have been unwell for a week, but feeling better now. Apparently it's Easter this weekend, which means it's the annual Crème Egg Festival at chez Blue. This is a private occasion, but this brief clip should give you a clue as to what will be going on.
Yet, it is only because I wrote a lot that I figured this out. I experimented and I also gained CONFIDENCE to admit where I really needed to be writing. I was less prone to listen to what other people thought and decided to take my path.
2-pound butternut squash, peeled, seeded, cut into 1/2-inch cubes
Anaru: Hi, Poppo. …Yeah, I’m not but he’s working now. It seems he’s in some favor of our manager. He’s going to there with you at the evening, right? What? Did you say the construction site in Mount Hitsuji? Isn’t it going to be a too tough job for his first day?! …Yeah, I know. To make money quickly, working at the construction site is one of the best ways. Anyway, I didn’t know rockets soar up with huge bucks.
One GREAT tip from Gala is avoid gossip mags...what a great tip because all they do is teach us to be judgemental and bitchy to other women and enjoy other's misfortune and that is just fucked up, right?
Rel jumped. What was he supposed to have done? He’d been too surprised by Van Raighan’s Gift to pay attention. Fortunately, the Sherriff was still focussed on the diminutive thief.
I've had so much fun working with all the greens on these St. Patrick day cards (for those that don't know, it is my favorite colour and pairing it with kraft makes it even more fun). Makes my heart sing -- and be glad it is just my heart that's singing, otherwise it would be a sad, sad, situation LOL! Yes, tin buckets and I get along very well thank you ;)
I've also been doing my Pilates DVD which has really helped my core strength a ton. This is made by the instructor that I had private lessons with to work on my abdominal separation and my hip problems. As of this week, I do not have hardly any separation at all and though my arms and my legs were aching after my lesson, I had almost zero hip pain. Hurrah!
Turn on the food processor fitted with the steel blade and drop the garlic down the feed tube; process until it’s minced. Add the rest of the ingredients to the food processor and process until the hummus is coarsely pureed. Taste, for seasoning, and serve chilled or at room temperature.
ABSTRACT BALANCE-SHEET
Yes you did, Sean. It is frightening to see that in the US people are still expressing such views, when the UK has moved beyond them.
I also attended an Art Forum on Tuesday which discussed Financial Growth in the Arts. The panel shared how they receive an income and work as artists or in the arts field. Some did not want to explore working a side job and may have felt like it would be a compromise. In making that decision, they either had to make sacrifices when it came to enjoying certain pleasures of life or created a life around their artwork which paid for living expenses and other ventures. Other artists structure their lives by working for a company, building a family and creating art. I want to find that balance. Live comfortably, but still create. I think I can do this with a solid plan.
Recommended for Fans Of...: Stylistically, this novel reminds me of Sold by Patricia McCormack. An Na's A Step From Heaven, and First Crossing: Stories about Teen Immigrants, edited by Don Gallo, and
forgots that it was Tuesday! Cause I didn't see my
There’s more on Jack Straw the Islamophile. In a speech to British Muslims, in 2002, Straw castigated the West and told them about its evil deeds through the years. He even went-all-SWP and talked of the crimes of ‘British imperialism’. Later, in 2005, Straw also said that Muslims gave the world mathematics (wrong) and the ‘digital age’ (wrong again).
"CSIR-URDIP is not conducting the examination of patent applications. The scope of our services is to search for prior art. DIPP also in its discussion paper has clearly stated that ³The Department had taken an initiative to outsource some part of the prior art search of the Patent office to CSIR.²
"having a really bad car accident every single day for about two years."
lifestyle. One time when the Nutrisystem commercial was on, she said, "When I go on a diet, I'm going to go on that one, because you can eat chocolate." When she goes on a diet?? It's a hard time to grow up now. I pray for her self-image. I pray specifically that she will learn to eat healthily, neither to excess nor starvation. I pray that she will see herself as loved and created by God, who doesn't make mistakes.
The spider on the bar stool scuttled around as if looking for a way to dismount. Obadiah watched it, perplexed. The thoughts that had arrived in his head a moment before had left him uneasy and he felt like a long forgotten well within him had been opened. The light was shining inside him and it made him restless. “Look,” he started to say out loud but before he could finish whatever it was he was going to say, the spider on the seat started to glow, first orange then gradually an angry red. “Think Obadiah!” a voice, Obadiah now recognised was not his own, rang shrilly in his head. “Think!” it commanded.
every morning my son and I get up at the same time. I hear about all these mamas who rise up early before their kids and have quiet times or get all this stuff done, and I think that's awesome. I just can't do it! I would be exhausted all day!!! especially now, with my pregnancy, it's all I can do to get up when my little boy does, I can't imagine trying to get up earlier ;)
I’m not much of a subscriber myself. I don’t really enjoy the massive amounts of e-mails I get from automated system. Off the top of my head I can only think of one person who I subscribe to their e-mails, and I don’t even read them all. I am more of a bookmark the page, or put it in my default tabs kind follower.
This is the highest form of appreciation we Tablers could have received from any donor. When a donor hosts a party for you , it goes on to say that he appreciates the good work we are doing and that too at zero overheads. He didn’t fail to highlight that most of the NGOs in the world spent as much as 70% of the funds on their admin cost. So out of a rupee donated only 30 paise gets channelized. In Round Table for every 1 ruppee of the donor , taking into account the matching contributions from the local people and cost savings due to efforts of tablers , at least 3 rupees is being utilized.
I marvel at George Washington, at his steadiness and perseverance. It had to do I think with the quality described by that queer, old-fashioned word: honor. It's what's missing from our lives, public and private. We have our Franklins and Jeffersons and Hamiltons: we have worldly cleverness and ideological fervor and vaulting ambition. Plenty of all of those. What we desperately lack is that dogged resolve, that determination to do nothing mean or underhanded, which earns over many years a deep, abiding trust.
A few weeks back my cousin got married, goodness it made me feel a bit old, I remember the day he was born and when he was little attending our wedding in a cute little suit. Now I am not really a fan of formal events like weddings, christenings etc as I am more of a welly wearing lady rather than a posh shoe lady and I am not really into all the pomp and circumstance of it all (it makes me feel uncomfortable for some reason). I got a bit stressed on the run up to the day frantically trying to find outfits for all the kiddies as all the bloomin summer clothes had been removed from the shops but it was worth the stress as it was such a fun day. Oh how I hate clothes shopping - I only really like charity shop shopping now, probably why I haven't bought myself clothes for ages.
I can now go back to falling asleep even MORE during movie watching.
The kids can come home and dump their belongings in the baskets, which will keep things off the floor (see the before) and contain the mess.
I watched 11 of my strong, amazing, wonderful friends celebrate one of the most important moments of their life this week. I sobbed uncontrollably all the way home.
An interesting cricket match.
My boys are 8 and 10. On the weekend, they might check in for lunch, and that is it. I don’t see them all day. Sometimes they come home soaked to the skin from swimming in the creek. They ride their bikes on the roads all over the neighborhood. They climb trees and build forts and get scraped up. They’ve never even been to the emergency room (yet), because I’ve taught them to use their heads and not rely on adults as the end-all-be-all when it comes to common sense.
Me: "I don't think there was a woman named Ava in the Bible. I can look, but I don't think so."
Finally, we arrived in Gaspe, surprised to find that, out of the motels that were open (many aren't open this early in the tourist season), most were full or nearly full!! But, though it was a bit pricier than we'd hoped, we ended up staying in a very nice motel in the dead center of Gaspe proper. These photos were taken around Gaspe on Thursday, our first full day there:
I always print out my online orders and then after shipping, since the orders are recorded online, I shred the paper. What a waste! I am now putting my used paper in the rear feed tray (to print things like customer online orders) and my new paper in the bottom tray (for things like shipping labels).
So without rehashing the case against capital punishment any further I'd like to expand this whole argument into a simple principle of restraint on the power of the state. A golden rule on limiting executive power, if you will. Simply put it is this:
Have you ever watched a scary movie where you know something terrifying is about to happen but the director drags it out with the creepy music and the made-you-looks but you just know it's all winding up for something so frightening you're going to sleep with the lights on for the next week? And the longer it takes for the Big Event to happen, the more wound up and tense you get? And you're practically peeing your pants in fear from all that build up and anticipation even though nothing all that scary has even happened yet?
So the next time you need to, or better yet, want to travel…Let us help, it’s what we do.
Suddenly there is hacking. They are both getting over a cold.
Blond:ish Mixmag Feature
16. CUTTER’S WAY (1981)
Even if we take it that the stupid excuse worked because every characters in Code Geass universe is dumb, remember this, Lelouch only told this excuse to the student council so what about Shirley’s non-student council’s friend?
Cross our hearts, cross out words, Here is something that is crystal clear I Love You ”til the games disappear.
She notes that children are constantly seeking the answer to the question, "How do I do life?" Jinny says, “When we would rather look good than be honest, we are feeding our kids a false formula--which they will eventually figure out and walk away from in frustration.”
And he's a huge success! He blows a few bubbles shouts with joy, "I did it I did it", smiles big and directs me to his latest accomplishment, "Look big bubbles mom - right there right there - big bubbles".
When my wife and I went there on a recent Sunday morning after church, there was a line of people waiting out the door — something I have never in my life seen at an Oak Lawn restaurant.
Look out for my follow-up post to this, "The Curse of 'White-Knighting'" in which I will discuss the horrors of giving a shit.
(late rain clings to your leaves, shaken by light wind),
What, to you, is a brewer?
Your text field should be of the Single line type.
Well the play ‘Forever 27′ has been in rehearsals for a while now but I’ve just confirmed a visit with the company who are touring my new one person play!
Baby, I ain't got no money, but honey I'm rich on personality."
But it's all okay! Islam is here to help us! Not like those nasty Jews! (And yes, I realize that with that sarcastic comment my heathen, Germanic/Scandinavian ass will be thrown in the fire). Islam is here to save us from the Racist Jews! And don't worry, everyone can join and get away with it!
Truth be told, I don’t like the extreme cold or searing heat so my favourite seasons are obviously Spring and Autumn. It’s like a little bit of electricity pulsing in the air…telling your body that a big change is on the way. Lately, the disappointing summer is fading away to crisp, sunshine filled mornings. The leaves are blushing like crazy with their deep ruby redness.
4. Red, orange or gold bell peppers; Roma tomatoes, .77/lb. at Sprouts (through 3/9/11)
A very good friend of ours received the 2011 Outstanding Young Alumni Award recognizing leadership, exceptional achievement in her field and outstanding contributions to the community. We are so proud of her! xo
I watched the first Guy Ritchie movie on DVD at a friend's home in Venice and QUITE enjoyed it but couldn't help wondering why you would take a detective best known for his cerebral (Cereboral?) skills and change him into an all-action hero.
Nowhere is this trend more obnoxious than in the particular case of the commodification of knowledge, whereby subjects are grouped into the ‘useful’ ones (i.e. ones that have commercial spin-offs) and the ‘useless’ ones (i.e. ones that don’t), with the latter, unsurprisingly, being dismissed. Or, as more hicklodytic commentators might be inclined to say: “Yer gettin’ a degree in that? What kinda jarbs would that get ye?”
“If you’re a service person, and if you get it wrong at your point in the customer’s chain of experience, you are very likely erasing from the customer’s mind all the memories of the good treatment he or she may have had up until you. But if you get it right, you have a chance to undo all the wrongs that may have happened before the customer got to you. You really are the moment of truth.” From: Service America
My skates have retired to a box marked – Troublesome Roller Skates (do not wear).
From my absolute favorite book of the Bible:
Today we travel four hours into the high sierra’s to teach God’s Word in another indigenous community where persecution of Christians is ongoing. In fact, one of the students who will be there pastors the church on the neighboring mountain. Two months ago he was beaten unconscious. That’s the second time in as many months. Persecuted for his faith, not the lack of it.
My niece still doesn't want anyone to go into the school and talk to the administrators about this, but my sister and I are concerned that if someone doesn't speak up now, on my niece's behalf, she's going to take the brundt of the punishment for something another kid is equally or more so to blame. Both girls have friends who have been witnessing this bullying, so at some point those other kids could get drawn into the mix and their actions could be called into question. I feel at this point, it isn't going to get better until someone stands up and calls everyone on the carpet - the school for letting it go on, the parents of all kids involved and all of the kids witnessing or participating.
Debbie immediately found a sign made just for her.
My gravity?
Ahh Sarah Palin, we hardly knew ye!
As if that wasn't enough to keep me busy around the clock, I made a spur of the moment decision to purchase a challenge kit from Amy over at Amy Beads, who I met through the Beading Babes group. I chose to buy this kit in orange because I liked the focal bead, I like Amy, and the colors in the kit are so far outside my comfort zone that it really inspired me to challenge myself!
Milton Moses Ginsberg (who never again directed a feature-length film) is a true artist. You know, one of those who sits in the local coffee shop and complains about capitalism to whoever will listen. He doesn’t care if there isn’t a full moon every night, which renders the plot senseless, he has stuff to say. He doesn’t care about developing the romantic subplot, he’s just keeping the less educated viewers interested while he paints a picture of America, drip by Communist drip. His direction is sub-Cormanesque, and his editing is at about the high school level. This is one of those guys who knows he’s got talent.
After about 20 minutes, I was back home. I started passing out the burgers, and found that I had 6 plates, and 6 fries, yet only 5 burgers. But I paid for 6. I was not happy. Jimmy said that he'd be fine with a hot dog, so I did end up with a burger after all. But I was out the dollar. Sigh.
Green Smoothie!
Corn flour mixed with a little water
Add in half of the sauce and mix well, a pair of chopstick together with a spatula make this an easy task. Add in the tofu, preserved turnip, peanut and dried chili flakes and mix well. Pour in the rest of the Phat Thai sauce and continue to stir until noodles are tender. (add a little water or extra cooking oil from time to time if the noodles are sticking to each other).
The routine means that even when you're tired you can function because you know what to do without really thinking.
Onto my card for the day~ I purchased a bunch of digi images about a month ago and decided to take this adorable image from Michelle Perkett, aptly called "Cutie Patootie Birthday Mermaid", out for a spin.
The Jews there before Paul thought all was well for they still had the temple, the priesthood and the oracles of God. They did not know that the Lord had departed from them.
But who doesn't like guitar, right? I don't think you understand. Jimi Hendrix played guitar. Groucho Marx played guitar. I think Winston Churchill might have played guitar. What I play is something different.
This the Lady Chapel of Ely Cathedral in England. The exterior is seen below. This Cathedral was a few blocks from the house of Oliver Cromwell, the Puritan Lord Protector, who overthrew the monarchy in the 1650s. The statue of Mary is a relatively modern addition. Notice the various recesses behind the altar, on the walls, and on the exterior above the entrance below.
If I could bottle a magic potion and distribute it to the world, I would. But the widsom in me knows that quick fixes are just that...quick. Quick to come and quick to go. Lasting peace takes the work. And the work takes desire. And desire is fueled by knowing what we don't want. And knowing what we don't want is clarified by pain.
And like with the use of drugs and alcohol, this narcotic of television is particularly dangerous when consumed by children given that their brains are not fully developed.
TIP: When working out start with a certain number of songs. Say 5 songs and that is how long you work out for. Then each week add another song or two. This will help you so you work out longer and longer each week but you are not so focused on the time!
I have learned small things about myself on vacation. I like to walk to town for the paper and coffee and bread. That fresh blueberries are delicious. That having music on during the day is delightful. Being away is wonderful in its own right, but the best of it is coming back better.
Wall Street, Big Oil, President Obama, the Fed, environmentalists, the EPA have all been accused of pinching hardworking Americans at the pump.
Though the “garden plant” makes of a better man (patient, willing and kind), sometimes it’s just not enough……
Now, dip each mint piece into the choco. I use a fork and just tap them in and out, then use a toothpick to remove the chocolate from the fork. Place chocolate on parchment to dry - about 2 hours. Remove and YUM!
And here I have mentioned the word which has become one of the most deadly weapons used against the European race and the most poisonous agent of their destruction.
Once we arrived at ONU we put on our winter coats and headed to the football field for some games, rides, food, and the football game. I love this little hat that Trey used to wear - it makes Xavier look like a cute little winter baby.
i'm happy i have fabulous friends
‘All the churches have scrupulously respected and often supported the state authorities. They have made of conformity a major virtue. They have tolerated social injustices and the exploitation of some people by others, explaining that it is God’s will that some should be masters and others servants, and that socioeconomic success is an outward sign of diving blessing.’
with decent traction
And so Allen, who was not the least bit eager to do so, got up and trotted fearfully over toward the secret door, which was still cracked open a hair.
Preview: Friday 11th May 2012 , 6 - 9pm
P.S. I'll be back to Twitter-ing soon too! :)
There was a time some years ago when I wanted to lose weight. I was finally mentally ready to do so after resisting for quite a while – and as the weight came off, I became a lighter person both physically and psychologically. The process of shedding the pounds was also a process of shedding things which for so long I’d thought I needed to be whole, but which I found had actually become burdensome, preventing me from taking the lighter, but stronger, stand in the world. By me during that weight-loss journey and ultimate emergence, were many friends, of whom a vast number were authors and illustrators. Conversations during that time were fascinating and inspiring, as talks about losing weight seemed to merge naturally with talks about getting rid of excess in our lives and in our writing and artwork. We were one in the appreciation of the struggles, the lows, the highs, and ultimately, the fine results of relieving a person, a painting, a story from heavy obstacles that might inhibit them from reaching their full potential.
One of the two best new shows of the year. The whole cast is solid. And I love that they can maneuver back and forth to have the main plot line focus on different family members. I have laughed at an awful lot of lines from this show. And it just keeps getting better and better. Moon landing, heh heh.
As I mentioned before, I'm attending the classes at 21 Secrets. And one of them is called credit card flowers by the lovely Martha Lever with her charming American accent. You can see a short vid on her blog.
It is all about HIM and any attempt to bring ourselves into the picture, is not only disrespectful but detracts from the Glory that belongs to Him and Him alone! Praised be His Holy Name!
Not one actor can be faulted in this film; even Chandler plays the stereotypical widower dad who doesn't really understand his son with more dimension than expected. There's even a great smaller part for terrific character actor Glynn Turman as a school science teacher with a secret agenda all of his own.
i think back to all the male friends i kept, and how little attention i got from men. i was quiet, shy and the antithesis of flirty. if a guy liked me, i wanted it to be because i was strong, confident and capable...not just because i had a nice ass and a cute face.
BP's CASTROL motor oil products are distributed in a unique bottle design for which BP received a design patent. The patent expired in 2005, but BP continued to mark its bottles with the patent numbers. Respondent Thomas A. Simonian (a patent attorney) filed a qui tam relator complaint under 35 U.S.C. §292.
Mix together the dry ingredients - 1 1/2 cups flour, 2 1/2 teaspoons baking powder, and a dash of salt.
MARISOL: Two. Maybe five.
“I kena chased out at clementi, waited 3 trains before boarding again. Train came every min but it’s alrdy full to the door, so what’s the point???”
The coming of sound shouldn't have fazed a polymath like her, but she never clicked in sound pictures (which if nothing else made it significantly harder to sustain a multi-lingual career), and she seems to have married well and more or less left the limelight by the mid-30s. She did have one great lost opportunity - Chaplin wanted her for City Lights; she would have deprived Virginia Cherrill of her little moment of immortality, so perhaps it's all for the best.
The part of the ghost was a good twist as there was none only a thief that seemed like a ghost to those around. I liked the ending how the story had concluded with the continual wit D’Alessandro carried through the entire book.
Please arrive at least 15 minutes before show time (earlier if you’re a performer!), so you can first stop at the refreshment counter to get a delicious beverage, snack or sandwich; then head for the show area and grab a seat so you don’t miss any of our great performers!
For some who are struggling to protect the earth the creation of a new crime of 'ecocide' would lend support. I am unimpressed by this attempt to use the bureaucratic system of legal rights, which seems to be as misguided as attempts to reconceptualise nature as 'ecosystem services'. Both routes contribute to what Wordsworth called the laying waste of our powers, both encourage the escape from the body into the head, from passion to argumentation, which have led us into this mire.
a decision”
Kenny stood and met Danielle halfway around the table. He cupped her chin in his hand. He bent and said in her ear, “Dani, I love you, but I can’t be with you. It hurts. I just hope you are doing the right thing and stay safe.”
Starting with the foyer art I finally hung. I went out and bought some command strips, since these particular frames have a flat back and the hook and nail made it stick out from the wall. It all worked out in the end:
Like I said, it's never happened to me and I hope it never does. But as many times as it is required to park the stroller, it crosses my mind.
I know that God is with me at all times, and that the Holy Spirit lives in each of us. These days, I am also confident of God’s love for me… However, once again, I find myself in a position where ‘the spirit is willing but the flesh is weak’. My faith burns in me, and prayer is becoming more and more a feature of my daily life. But, I realise I still have a long way to go yet.
· tips for communicating with legislators and health officials
2006, US, directed by Ivan Reitman
The card I'm showing is made for our son. As he likes Japan so much I thought he might like a dragon. I had some fabric (I bought it ages ago)with the image which I put on doublesided glue foil and cut the image. After that I just put it on the card which is black and some gold paper on top and black again on the gold paper. I made the eyes pop with some gold coloured rhinestones.
As for experiencing the 7th grade, no certificate or ceremony could have prepared me for that.
The Three Suns - Fever & Smoke (1961)
-- Thank you, kindergarten friends exposed to nasty stuff. Should I forbid this, ridicule it, ignore it, subvert it? How how how? (I kind of do the last 3, though I really just want to do the first.)
Have a great weekend and see y'all when I get back.
Mr Clegg, speaking on the opening day of his party’s spring conference, insisted austerity measures must be targeted at the wealthy – with tax relief on their pensions also in the Government’s sights.
Just a little reminder of the well-known fact that Dogs have owners and Cats have staff.
The same thing happened to me once while listening to a young orphan in China play his small violin for a group of visitors. We had just heard the story of how he lost his parents and came to live in the orphanage. He sat silently during the story, one tear sliding slowly down his cheek. Then he quietly picked up his instrument and soothed himself with it. He looked at me, and without warning, a flood of tears rushed down my face. It might sound ridiculous, but I felt as if I could literally feel his pain.
Building Permit Tax
Well, I wrote introductory pieces for each of them awhile back…
” You are much softer than my girlfriend”, he admitted.
12. Reno Nevada
Check it out here
Mice: luckily I'm ok with these as the cats keep bringing them in and then I have to catch them and put them back outside.
metals.
That sounds like one of those classic job interview questions, where I'd normally fish out words like dynamic, flexible and task orientated. But seeing as how it isn't, I'll say that I want to bring openness, humour, warmth and creativity. Not that they weren't here before, but it'll be my own special recipe.
And in doing all these things, Redford seemingly went out of her way to alienate potential supporters.
This is one of those bible verses used by young earth creationists to “prove” that dinosaurs coexisted with humans. The Behemoth, say YECists, was probably a sauropod of some sort. The Leviathan, a few pages down the road in Job, was probably a therapod like T-rex. As a 12-year-old in the throws of learning about this stuff, I was quite taken with these ideas, and the verse from Job does work well for a description of a large, majestic beast. (Not that it has any place, really, in a parody, since it isn’t exactly funny, save perhaps in a meta sense). Biblical commentaries usually say the Behemoth was maybe a hippopotamus or an elephant, whereas the Leviathan, they say, was probably a crocodile. 30-year-old-me finds all of these explanations pretty sorry. The Behemoth and the Leviathan were fixtures of mythology in the area of the world in which Job was written (as was the Ziz, a griffin-like air monster associated with the Leviathan (a sea monster) and the Behemoth (a land monster) who didn’t get mentioned in Job and so gets left out of these discussions). While the bible may only mention them once or twice, there’s a broader tradition in which they’re involved. They needn’t be based on real animals, living or extinct, in order to carry meaning.
How did the Rowing Fisherman catch my imagination? I originally practised Tai Chi but came across Jiangan’s 17 Exercises Routine and adopted it as a complete and comprehensive daily body maintenance. There is no need to practice any additional exercise for general health, fitness and wellbeing, so I no longer practice Tai Chi for these purposes.
These are all questions that may come into your head and they are also the ones that prevent you from moving? We talked about it before, it is the paralysis from analysis. There are thousands of types of exercises, all are good, whether it’s yoga, walking, sprinting, lifting…. If you are looking for health, do the ones you enjoy!
Is mere existence even worth it? What’s the point of life? If it’s to reproduce, that’s not very productive, since the point of that is pretty much to just keep life in existence. Love? I’m not even sure what love is at this point, since it’s been swallowed and regurgitated so many times by media. Maybe I’m just biased because I’m young and “naive.” I would hope that it’s not money.
Dearest Readers,
LEVY E. French economic evaluations of influenza and influenza vaccination. Pharmacoeconomics 1996; 9 (Suppl. 3): 62-66.
I have never read another book written the way Hilary Mantel writes. Her use of the English language, to me, is extraordinary. I loved how she got into the mind of Thomas Cromwell. Instead of the heartless monster he’s all too often portrayed as, we are shown a sympathetic, human portrayal of this great man. And he was a great man. This is, without a doubt, the best historical fiction novel I’ve ever read. Well, until I finish Bring Up The Bodies, perhaps.
potatoes - 5-6 medium sized
It looks like my usually reliable source was wrong: the wine kiosks live! I'm so happy; I was really looking forward to seeing these wastes of money in operation. Thank you, PLCB, for restoring my faith in your bad decision-making capability!
Similarly, it's hard to know where to place Jackal in the grand scheme of things. There's an unquestionable pop glamness about "Year of the Tiger", but its doomy, apocalyptic lyrics seem to stem from Black Sabbath, and the wellington boot-in-mud noise of the synths sounds could only be inspired by Moroder. It's a wonderful single, though, which seeps atmosphere and saunters with sheer conviction - a lesser band could have made the whole affair sound truly ridiculous, but the A-side here draws its inspiration from the likes of Locomotive's "Mr Armageddan" rather than "In the Year 2525". Named after the Chinese astrological year which apparently frequently summons war, earthquakes and famine, it broods on your turntable for three-and-a-half minutes utterly confident in its own ability to summon up the four horsemen, and as such is one of the rare singles to dominate a room without a powerful chorus or even an upbeat rhythm to aid it. Apparently it managed to pick up some radio play in the UK at the time of release, but it flopped - though perhaps unsurprisingly, it's been plundered by a psychedelic compilation series since, and is available on iTunes to buy. You can find a brief clip of it below, however, and somebody has been kind enough to upload it on to YouTube here.
Anyway, after much shuffling, hemming, hawing and a couple of sticky fingers I finally got a pass to get onto the airport to inspect the airplane, logbooks and paperwork. Normally, India won't let crews onto the airport till 2 hours prior to flight. This wasn't going to do, since I needed to be there early enough to get whatever passed for a maintenance facility to fix anything I found wrong. They coughed up the pass about 4 pm local. Luckily, the maintenance guys were there till 5.
1. You'll need four main pieces of fabric:
Recently, Council Member James provided a grant to MS 113 to provide air conditioning units for the entire school. Before the grant, the spring and summer brought temperatures to the classrooms that were not suitable for instruction. Now students and teachers will be able to get back to their precious instructional time on warm days; in the past, teachers were forced to leave the classroom due to risk of health concerns.
Add Decorative Paper to the Top & Inside Shelf
· Uses strong business acumen, technical awareness and basic project management skills to perform assigned tasks.
I just love going to Arizona to visit Clif and Charlotte, they have such amazing hospitality one can sure get spoiled there. I'm so glad I'm a part of this wonderful family, thank-you Clif and Charlotte for opening up your home to us.
This time round, I saw Chicken Wings on the display tray, and a lot of Filo pastries. I thought to myself, "Finally!"
I clean the sofas and floors from their muddy paws and curtains and soft furnishings from their hairs. I put up with cat hair on my clothes and on my bedding and occasionally even on my plates or my food.
Under such harsh working conditions as evidenced by African writers such Mary Prince, the possibility for learning by doing, by experiment, by guidance in their community of practice, from more experienced cane field practitioners, was the significant approach. Possibly, the 124 cane field workers at Wingfield would have been divided between the four drivers, but not in equal proportions, because the only woman driver is described as being the ‘driver for the small gang’. The larger teams were driven by the men. There were possibly three overseas because of the number of the three ‘overseers cook’ and the three ‘overseers boy’.
Damn Calvinistic streak.
Our chosen lunch break place - truly heavenly. We parked the trusty landrover (on loan from our friend Peter) under a tree next to a little waterhole. Here there is absolutely no noise other than birdcalls, insect sounds and the wind blowing through the leaves of the mopane trees.
The other encounter happened at La Fontaine de Mars. While waiting for our table in a cramped space, we started talking with an American couple who was on vacation. Again, the conversation quickly turned to how we met. Fred explained that he was at Berkeley National Lab in Northern California completing his mandatory military service. The woman quipped: “What do they teach you in the French military? Surrender Lessons?” Just prior to this, she was telling us about her 19 year old son who was studying abroad at a prestigious private school and who was fluent in three languages. She’s hardly the type of person that should be throwing around jokes about “surrender lessons” when her pampered son was studying languages in a foreign county; unless, of course, he planned on using those languages to be a windtalker. (Oh, and she was asking Fred how to say things in French, and to recommend touristy things for her!). Her husband was far too sweet for her, he hushed her and looked very apologetic. She was a doctor, he was a school teacher. I suppose he viewed her as a retirement plan, as there’s no other explanation as to why he was still with her.
Fernando Alonso took to the track for Scuderia Ferrari. The Spaniard’s programme for the day included development of new components and increasing the understanding of the behaviour of the tyres. Unfortunately, the track conditions, with only a small window of dry time in the late morning, required a drastic revision of the programme. The afternoon was particularly limited, when the only work carried out was some practice starts. At the end of the day a total of 46 laps had been completed, the quickest in a time of 1.22.444, which was the fastest outright.
Regular Price $15.99 Blow Out Price $7.99
He was slightly out of breath.
“Basically, Android’s market share isn’t going to increase that much compared to 2011,” said Roberta Cozza, principal analyst at Gartner.
“The trees are alive!” I hear the Old Crone call out. “Alive and hungry for souls!” She calls.
The last time I had spoken to my father on the phone, his spirits seemed lifted, he was much more lucid and I even heard him laugh, which was a sound I hadn’t heard in ages. After I hung up, I was thrilled, ran around town telling my confidantes that he was getting better, that things were looking up, that everything just might be okay after all.
By Ashish Seth
'Cause the taxes on the farmer feeds us all”.
Magazine cover photo of Small Room Decorating magazine taken by Wendell T. Webber and used with permission of the magazine publisher. Kathryn Bechen/Kathryn Bechen INK cannot give anyone permission to use that photo.
Donald Byrd (tp)
Just like a million other 'plans' of mine, this too was forgotten and life went on. But the food gods had other plans. I was again put forth with the option of trying a crème brulee at yet another French restaurant and this time, although it was not as fabulous as the first experience, it pushed me well enough to make it at home.
my head in his lap,
“You are wearing the stars of the northern sky as seen from our woodlands during the late fall. The fairies refer to this garment as the Cloak of Wheels, for each star in the fabric represents the eight seasonal transitions in our farming calendar. Two spokes in the little wheels stand for the longest and shortest days of the year. Those days, as you well know, are the summer and winter solstices. Two more spokes represent the spring and autumnal equinoxes, when the hours of night and day, light and dark, are in complete balance. The other four spokes mark the sacred holidays that we celebrate in between the solstices and the equinoxes. These celebrations are the Blessing of the Seeds, the Festival of Many Blossoms, the Bread of the Sun, and the Harvest of the Dark,” Hannah informed Panther. “The outermost circle, which binds the eight spokes together, represents the time it takes for the Earth to completely orbit around the Sun. Each wheel on this precious cloak is thus a symbol for the four seasons: spring, summer, autumn, and winter. The fairies call this type of magical calendar the Wheel of the Year.”
“Golem! Strike him down!” he commanded, hiding behind a pillar and fumbling in his quiver for some alchemical bombs to hurl at his would-be assailant. The gladiator, fortunately, was more focused on the giant rock monster than Lord Bath.
now i am on the look out for chairs. i want a bench seat for one side, 2 carver chairs for the ends & chairs for the other side. but for now our old 70's plastic orange chairs will have to do.
5) What is at least one thing you want to make sure you do next year?
DO join us again tomorrow for our new challenge. It will be One Layer Week again... you know how you love it!
Well, this is the beginning of the end of my old blogs. I didn’t know it at the time but this is when Myspace would begin its changes and I would begin reposting my blogs on. Fear not! Heh, while this is the beginning of the end the end is still sometime in 2010 that I finally stopped.
Not all friendships are easy. Some friendships are difficult and demanding and hard to maintain. Some leave you questioning what you really get out of them. But life is too short for complicated relationships. Instead of analyzing, and treading carefully, I accept that it is what it is.
tonight is a haloed crescent moon blurred by clouds. i love the dead seasons but i’m looking forward to this spring.
More actual albums coming soon hopefully! My life has been hectic lately. Just wanted to get this playlist on here cause... it's amazing :)
I ran 3 miles last night through the sunny, chilly ‘hood, and felt pretty solid at the end of it.
“The Prince of Egypt” (Disney)- (30 min. from plagues to end)
While putting on antiperspirant/deodorant the other day (I sweat a lot), I happened to notice Speed Stick™ had slapped a QR code on the back of the product:
Omega is Lovely
Her touch felt like the fuerza.
I pulled them out to see what they looked like and he had the ring tied into the laces. I had him tie it back in a few hours later to take the picture.
Kwon (Yang) Yo Seob
In part thanks to WWF influence, South Africa recently suffered a sobering case of civil society failure. It was again on display last week when 100 chastened climate activists gathered in a desultory Durban hotel to provide each other with autopsy reports from the COP17 climate summit last December. Those most humbled (myself included, as a result of excessive pre-summit hype about our traditions of protest) worried that the country’s climate justice movement failed to demand accountability from the 1% negotiating elites inside the convention centre who were, to put it scientifically, plotting genocide and ecocide.
He watched with mounting dread as Mike slung the duffel bag over his shoulder and marched toward him with a mile-wide grin. Mom did her best to keep up, eyeing her husband uncertainly.
Yet, the weekend was nice, and relaxing, and trouble-free. Even the rides there and back weren't bad. The newly purchased used car ran like a champ, we saw mountains, and Amish buggies, and rolling hills with barns tucked neatly within. We neatly avoided Philly at rush hour. Whew.
Watermelon Margarita's
and I have shoes..
Now author Peg Tyre, perhaps best known for her book The Trouble With Boys, provides parents with some basic guidelines to use when evaluating educational options. In her latest book, The Good School, Tyre says that parents should look at the relationship between teacher and students, the general intellectual environment (does it include plenty of words? everyday references to mathematical concepts?) and school playgrounds.
This blog will not be a personal blog about the shark you hate, it will be a blog about poker and my way to start up a new poker site.
Otley clearly have developed a healthy disregard for conformity or conventionality. It's almost as though they sat down, chose a beer style, and then proceeded to do only what they darn well pleased, focussing only on the quality of the end product and tossing aside preconceived notions of what they 'should' be trying to achieve.
at back doors hundreds of miles away and the brick-
* Jack White scored a nice number one on the album charts this week. Blunderbluss shifted more than 137,000 copies, according to stats from Nielsen Soundscan (and it’s a pretty good album…)
“You made fun of me!” Jenko says.
On the back is engraved:
And saved the whole misadventure.
Ciego de Avila, Cuba, May 8 (Prensa Latina) – The president of the Cuban Institute of Friendship with the Peoples, Kenia Serrano, stated in this city that the world movement for the release of the five Cuban antiterrorist fighters unjustly held in U.S. prisons since 1998 have been strengthened.
This past weekend Atrios, the proprietor of Eschaton, declared a Blogroll Amnesty Day, saying, "one of the big complaints by new bloggers is that it's impossible to get onto blogrolls because established bloggers tend not to add them." I thought that adding new lesser-known blogs to his blogroll would be a wonderful idea. Although for some inexplicable reason that I am at pains to discover, Atrios has never seen fit to link to me, I, nevertheless added Eschaton to my own blogroll and introduced myself to Atrios with a sincerely sycophantic email, since he is after all a blogging pioneer who deserves our respect.
So it was all done and set by six in the evening and I intended to get some sleep before I left, but I gave up lying in bed with the lights out for I was far too nervous to sleep. I got a short nap in after dinner though and then I was off. It’s taking the plunge that’s important, Kullu had said. Once you’re off you’ll get there somehow!
I replied, “I dunno… they’ve got CCTV all over the place here. I’m not sure this is a good time to go on the record.”
“You know Gorilla Bananas!” exclaimed Sir Paul. “I always wanted to see that ape perform, but I didn’t want people pestering me inside a circus tent. Did you ever see his act, love?”
Betsy here today to share some more cards made with the gorgeous Teresa Collins, Fabrications papers.
That remnant tempid water baptizes
I hope you will hope on over to the Creative Card Crew to see what the rest of the girls have whipped up to inspire you. I also hope you will play along; I'd love to see how you use Kraft!
What would be your top three tips for aspiring writers?
What I can be sure of is that it will remain a social evening with lots of very nice beer thrown in. And some trivia. Speaking of which, the latest attempt in a long line of attempts to knobble the champions has led to an unexpected sub-competition. You see, points – bonus points – are awarded for the funniest team names created. So, even if you happen to ace the quiz and, let’s just say as an example, that you equal the previous best ever highest score - you can still get beat! Which is a good thing and I’m not at all bitter.
Even though it was difficult, I pushed through. I got a water bottle large enough to make it easy to get in my daily allotment without losing count or stressing out about getting the right amount. I stayed diligent, only ordering water anytime we go out to eat, starting my day with a glass, ending my day with a glass, pushing through even when it is difficult. Over the last four months, my body’s aversion to water has changed. What used to be a struggle, is not something I rely on. When I’m thirsty, I crave water. I know when I haven’t had enough.
*Wait to load
It made me think a few things too. I should value what I do as a "homemaker." Motherhood does matter. Yes, I should do my best to keep my house in order and my kids happy, but I should also try to create some beauty in the world.
This happens all the time in relationships. We have all been guilty of taking a relationship for granted. We assume that the person will always be there for us because they have been there in the past so we stop doing everything we did to build the relationship in the first place. We stop acting in the best interest of the other person and start acting only in our own self interest in mind which inevitably leads to a deteriorating relationship. Sometimes it takes loosing the relationship to remind you of its value. If you can focus on maintaining the relationship over time by always understanding the value of each relationship then you can have more effective business and personal relationships.
Here are some, but please feel free to suggest more:
Under the hood, the Passat 2012 bucks the trend toward the ranks of middle-class all-four-cylinder engine with V-6 offers a robust, high-mileage diesel, and five-cylinder, two last are the only engine they type in the class.
1. Stop the roux at the light brown stage to quelch some of the bitterness.
She comes by, like clockwork, with a tiny white cup to dispense a tiny white pill.
I cropped Blanche to a closer up view as you can tell...
the Final Solution
R stood beside The Cardinal´s bed and watched him sleep. It is impossible to describe for how long he remained there, since it was a moment of eternity.
Paul Chambers – Bass
Now recognition of that fact is dawning on people in a convulsive fashion, and markets of all sorts are reacting as one would expect when their entire worldview is exposed as having been a gigantic and intentional pyramid scheme constructed of debt layered upon debt that cannot be paid down. The wrong thing was done in 2008 and there is zero evidence that our government has changed one iota in their singular focus on misdirection and lies in this regard.
He represents the magic that is starting to fade from my girls' eyes ...
TANGO IN MY TUMMY:
In case you're wondering what that is, it's on the right side bar under "Grab My Button". Someone asked me to explain how to make one and I'm not sure I can. If you don't know how to design a small blog button, I may not be able to help you with that.
No matter what pace you write, it is important to always feel the wind at your face.
Stamps: Petite Pairs, God's Beauty, Botanical Blooms
And we had a very early start the next day.
The past many months more and more I just haven't felt like blogging at all. I keep thinking that one day maybe I'll feel like sharing some of my days, the things that I love, and my projects, but for now I just feel quiet and private.
Money is just a way to keep score, nothing more. The sooner you believe that it is part of the whole concept of abundance, then it will no longer be something just out of your seeming reach.
4. Solar Fire (5:17)
c) "The newest—and nicest—road in Myanmar is, paradoxically, one of the emptiest as well: Only a handful of cars travel along the desolate four-lane highway to nowhere, or so it seems. But in fact, it leads to Naypyitaw, a new city in one of the world's poorest countries, carved out of the jungle and built from scratch by an aging, autocratic leader who then moved the nation's seat of government there, lock, stock and barrel."
The first is marketers' irrational obsession with young people. As I have written many times here, this insane, costly preoccupation with young people makes no business sense and is just a ritual left over from a long-gone era.
for whatever mood
"No! I don't want to see the video!!!"
When you’re starting out in the world of online dating, it can be difficult to learn the ropes. However, if you take the time to study the best online dating tips it will make your online dating endeavors much easier. Always use caution and make sure that you keep it simple, light and fun when starting conversations.
I don’t condescend toward young men because although I know more about many things and am more prudent and skillful in many ways, there are still areas about which they know more—and they’re also stronger. For instance, Josh can weld, and I can’t, and his mechanical ability is so far beyond mine that I had rather have him work on my car than to do it myself. And although he opposed having the tree cut, he came over when the job was done and spent most of a day using wedges and a twelve-pound sledgehammer to split three and four-foot rounds into firewood. As I watched him swing that hammer hour after hour in an accurate arc that took it high above his head, I was in awe because when I was seventeen, I was still a few years away from having such strength and coordination (I only weighed 115), and I sure don’t have them now.
This was a different time. August, 1962. On Halloween, children don’t need parental escorts to go trick-or-treating. Elderly passengers are instantly offered seats on a crowded subway car. And in Tommy and Joseph's neighborhood of Bensonhurst, fish trucks and pizzerias do a brisk business on Fridays. (This was before the Second Ecumenical Council and the Catholic Church still forbade the eating of meat on Fridays).
This month Stephanie Novatski Brought in her Home made Photo booth or light box what ever you want to call it , it was Cool .. I must make one for my self . Every one brought a doll with them so we could take some photos .
Master George dresses himself thank you very much!!!
Erika: “I know this doesn’t sound too crazy, but I’ve spent too much money on lip glosses that end up leaving a sticky color behind. This gloss is the perfect amount of slick and shine, with the perfect hint of sweetness! Nectar Nude is my go-to color over my Burt’s Bees balm before heading out for the night.”
Your greatest and most effective beauty tip is simple and costs nothing. To feel truly beautiful instantly, just smile. Take an extra second to acknowledge another person, even a stranger. Look them in the eye and grin. This action has a rippling effect. You can see the result and it feels good. Give a little and receive a lot. When we step out of our way to extend an act of kindness and attention to another, our body chemistry changes. A simple hello or a sincere acknowledgment will make you feel like the most beautiful person on the planet.
Invitation to Apply
I do not trust!
For more links about the Philippines, click on these links:
Of course, if these programmable markings do become an everyday reality, it will inevitably mean that every fifteen year-old on the planet will waste hours and hours trying to hack the local roadways, engineering gruesome pile-ups. J.G. Ballard will be arrested, remote control in hand, staring glassy-eyed through a window at the final crashes he has staged.
Alex and Rose are very much alike in so many ways. They're both kick-ass, stubborn, snarky, and cannot be contained. They act before they think, and that usually get them into trouble. They will do anything and everything to protect the one they love. Aiden St. Delphi is like Dimitri Belikov. Both are drop-dead gorgeous, hot and drooling... and they're the girls' mentors too. Rose has Mason, Alex has Caleb, and nemesis are ever present: Lea and Mia--both are bitches. When I think about the Pure, Half-Blood and Daimon, I remember the Moroi, Dhampir and Strigoi.
Rom 7:22 For I delight in the law of God after the inward man: But I see another law in my members, warring against the law of my mind, and bringing me into captivity to the law of sin which is in my members. O wretched man that I am! who shall deliver me from the body of this death? I thank God through Jesus Christ our Lord. So then with the mind I myself serve the law of God; but with the flesh the law of sin.
In the final days of the war, during the Battle of Berlin in 1945, Hitler married his long-time mistress, Eva Braun. On 30 April 1945—less than two days later—the two committed suicide to avoid capture by the Red Army, and their corpses were burned.
After 5 full days of not eating sugar, I'm feeling pretty good. The first 2-3 days were a bit iffy, very hungry and felt a bit off, but yesterday and today have been much better.
These strange underwater pyramid structures at a depth of two thousand meters were identified with the help of a sonar according to oceanographer Dr. Verlag Meyer. Studies of other structures like Yonaguni in modern day Japan have allowed scientists to determine that the two giant pyramids, apparently made of something like a thick glass, are really impressive – each of them is larger than the pyramid of Cheops in Egypt.
Observation Number Four: I really like cheese. Managed to snag my share from the cheese guy.
Runner Up : Epic - Hop Zombie
The white rabbit is a very powerful etheric,spiritual sign. When Alice followed her one it led her to wonderland. Nero was told to watch for and follow the white rabbit in in the film the Matrix..and it was the beginning of his journey to the releasing of his mind.
I was stepping in for a colleague whose son had tragically dropped dead in the street a few days before. I was there to take her Holy Communion, in her room in the old folks’ home where she lived.
While Jaffna is a political drama set in Sri Lanka, and has him pairing up with two female actors who’re yet to be cast, Kala Ghoda, directed by the late Basu Bhattacharya’s son Aditya, is a dark comedy written by Akshat Varma of Delhi Belly (2011) fame. Set in Mumbai’s underbelly, it revolves around two cops. John plays the volatile, no-nonsense Dilawar Khan. “He’s unlike any cop you’ve seen before in the way he speaks, dresses and his quirks. There’s a different edge to him, and I’m definitely not beefing up for the role as is being speculated,” he asserts.
who’ll woo you with sincere words.
17 matter
He has finals next week and we figured we’d drive down, go to church together, feed him, and haul back as much stuff as we could cram into our car.
I've not had much time for crafting, but I had to make something for my wittle baby brudder!! I find it difficult to make cards for him for some reason, even though he has quite a few interests. He wouldn't like anything fussy or fancy either - finally, I decided to go with a cricketing theme, as he loves the game and plays for his local club too. Here's what I ended up with:
The true meaning of forgiveness is to liberate yourself from your past, if you can forgive yourself you can always start a fresh and change your life for better. What we miss out most of the times is the cause of that change, it’s not because something needs to be done at an outer level, it’s something that stems out from within and starts expanding.
Without further ado, here’s my bucket list of people I’d love to meet, in no particular order:
“This is not the Barisan Nasional way. I never said ‘Don’t go to Penang’ when I was the Johor menteri besar.”
Would you like some eye candy so early in the day?
5. I have a super special treat coming up this week. My friend (and wonderful photographer), Carrie, came to take pictures of our old house before we moved. As were were moving, I was so thankful I had a blog to look back at to see the house and the progress we made. But I knew Carrie could capture our home in ways I never could -- hence her being a successful photographer! Be sure to check out Sweet Louise Photography and her blog. Not that you need any more encouragement to go check out her awesome work, but it also includes super cute babies and kiddos! In the meantime though, here's a teaser:
I'm trying to become more daring in my personal design choices and incorporating some bolder colors and patterns into our spaces.
This has not been the best week so far. In fact, by now I'm not even optimistic that the next two days will be any better. Way to start the post on a high note, huh? Monday was really just your average Monday-- a few kinks to work out as we changed gears from "relax" to "back to the grind." We found a house we like this past weekend, but since we're complete house-buying novices (not to mention that we weren't actually in the market, but happened to come across a deal on a fixer-upper that was just too good to pass up) we ended up wasting a trip to the real estate office, only to find out that we have to get mortgage-approved before we can move forward. So really, the worst part of Monday was wasting a trip to Daphne for information we could just have easily gotten over the phone. But yesterday... oh, yesterday was when things really started going wrong.
Artists: Jonsi
potential for viable fishing
The tap takeover was the idea of Sandy Williamson, who has just taken over the running and selection of the beers at the pub. His intention is to do more of these mini festivals at the end of each month with the focus being on highlighting the beer range of a different Scottish microbrewery each month. It is a great idea. The Harviestoun tap takeover appeared to be a success and I wish Sandy and Hengler's Circus all the best in their endeavour to support and bring the best of a resurgent Scottish Microbrewing sector to a thirsty and appreciative Glaswegian beer crowd.
There was no possibility of pointing out the bright side. We all burst into that painful, horrified nervous laughter, and my mother quickly closed the box.
I think might be writing me
A good iron
eat beans again - unless you want to.'
First they would inject my gonads with anaesthetic and wait a few minutes for it to take effect before getting hands on with my tubing.
I refer to the “one-armed-bandits” not just because the numbers are coincidentally what often “pays out” at the casino but also because my scales, like the “pokies”, can be a bit random at times.
At the grief group yesterday a woman said she wished her divorced daughter would find someone to grow old with. As if that’s all that was necessary — to find someone. I did have someone to grow old with, and now I don’t. Even if I come out of this okay, he will still be dead, so how is that okay? Damn it! This is not the way our lives were supposed to be!
Trying to search for therapists in the beginning of this year I found a female therapist that doesn't answer my e-mails,only put the number of her clinic.I don't know if I should call her,but my brother is always at home.I'm triyng to ask to some FtM sites(in one of them I found this therapist) because they are brazilian and maybe know some professionals who work in Curitiba.
In this suspense thriller, Rierdon discovers that a deadly species of vampire bats are responsible for a series of bizarre murders and she must find a way to stop them before they are completely out of control. Brett Butler ("Grace Under Fire") and Timothy Bottoms ("DC 9/11: Time of Crisis") star with an appearance by Craig Ferguson, host of CBS's "The Late Late Show."
I strongly recommend Whalerider as refreshing and empowering, as encouraging us to be flexible in defining people, and as a reminder of the need to hear and reconnect with the world around us.
further up the canyon a slight movement inside a cracked
onions - 1 large chopped lengthwise
The street cries of Chipping Sodbury could be heard far and wide!
The Paragons' recordings, most famously "Tide Is High", written by Holt, and featuring the violin of "White Rum" Raymond, are among the highlights of Jamaican popular music. "The Tide Is High" was taken to the top of the UK and US charts by Blondie in 1980; whilst Atomic Kitten's cover version also topped the UK Singles Chart in 2002."
I remembered the first day my mother brought me here. It was a Sunday late in the spring and I was only five years old. The sun was shining, the breeze blowing so lightly it seemed to leave kisses on our skin. She held my hand as we sat at the edge of the cliff, our feet dangling over the water, and she told me so many stories. Princes and princesses, dragons and knights, stories of adventure and excitement and promise.
Queen Elizabeth I never married so there is no need to speculate about the footwear she would have chosen for the great day. However, there is a story that her shoes (colour unspecified, but let’s say ‘red’ for the sake of continuity) were saved from spoiling in a muddy puddle, by the gallant act of Sir Walter Raleigh (1554-1618), who removed his cloak and laid it in her path. This always struck me as a rather silly thing to do, and the story paints Raleigh as something of a show-off, overshadowing his success as a writer, poet, soldier, courtier, spy, gardener, historian, religious enquirer, MP and explorer. It was a grand gesture but it didn’t save him from the executioner’s axe many years later. By then, King James I was on the throne, and he was not one to be so easily swayed. The legendary act is commemorated on a pub sign in Devon. This should please Alan, who gave us the shoe prompt for this week’s Sepia Saturday, but is also an aficionado of pub signs, which he demonstrates on his own blog
Sports are competitive. They were originally played to promote health, but through time they became a matter of who’s best. With the exception of college football’s Bowl Championship Series, which is finally changing to a four-team playoff, the current systems the various leagues use to determine the best in their sport, generally work well. Teams play a regular season to contend in the playoffs and ultimately share a common goal of becoming champion.
Sometimes it’s extra critical when superb variety of client have enable with Online to understand the appropriate one-way links with regard to their commerce. Business enterprise so that you can business enterprise WebPages has become the most valuable systems to receive ordinary concerning many hundreds equals. To get hunting supplement plus expert services several individuals have faith in online. Hence business enterprise buildings can get an improvement within problems. Due to this fact, business men may be found through have more to make its business enterprise. You will definitely get numerous possibilities connected association a person’s commerce.
Have to be there at the 11:30AM. I rush out of the house. I don’t like eleventh hour stress and never like to miss appointments. I got delayed that day due to some unavoidable reason and by the time I stepped out of the door it was 11:15AM. Luckily the destination wasn’t far, especially if I take the back road I could be there in 10mins. Or so, I thought. I failed to take into consideration the beautiful weather outside and the ensuing bicyclists.
Of course these technological conflicts always happen at the worst possible time, usually centered around deadlines of some sort.
chicken masala 1 tsp
What does this have to do with Fluffernutter Bread Pudding? Nothing. Absolutely nothing. I just could not bring myself to write about bread pudding or peanut butter. Did I mention that I was sick of bread pudding and peanut butter? So go put on some Lawrence Welk and make some of this fantastic bread pudding! Enjoy – and happy fluffernuttering!
So lets define beige as
a conspiracy of you
Last week we heard a sermon and I think it really summarized our feelings and encouraged us a lot to hear it. The Bible talks about people in hard times going through the valleys & when they come out of the hard time they reach the mountain top. At the top it is Beautiful to behold, & at the top you can rest for a time. But usually there is not too much to sustain us there, food & water are usually in short supply & not many trees can grow. It is in the Valley’s where things grow & can be sustained. In the Valley’s of life God grows us & teaches us to rely on him–it’s in the valleys of life that we really grow.
In "J. Edgar" we can see a parade of typewriters from various eras. Although only by a fraction of a second but they are a constant presence.
Watch this video and pass it along. And check your skin regularly. It takes 10 minutes and it could save your life.
The Census press office might evaluate whether revenues and the share of employer businesses matter more in assessing entrepreneurial performance than growth in the number of businesses. The latter figure is dominated by the number of non-employer businesses – companies with no workers and an average of $45,000 in annual sales. Growth in non-employer businesses might measure little more than the shedding of employees by corporations seeking to get out of paying for employment taxes and employee health insurance.
wolf and the lamb shall graze together; the lion shall eat straw like the ox,
To discuss May Day, we’re hosting a roundtable discussion with four guests in our studio.
Yes, exactly, just like that, I guess.
I smelled the disturbed
This recipe will make one roughly inch high cake. Considering this was the Clandestine Cake Club, I upped the cake a notch and made the recipe twice, and sandwiched the 2 cakes together with dark chocolate ganache. It was a delicious tweak! I used the ganache recipe from Maggie Beers Harvest book, that goes along with the chocolate fig cake.
because both bad and good (as well as other adjectives) obviously require as, not than, in comparisons. The juxtaposition of as and than without intervening punctuation is not logically defensible. Thus the sentence we’re sure they can judge a novel just as well if not better than us (London Review of Books, 1987) needs correcting to just as well as, if not better than, us.
* The skills mums have that can be transferred to the workplace
Burying him, and me
I am also willing to bet a lot of women buy clothing for a lifestyle they wish they had rather than one they actually have. My hand is up. I have more sequined garments than a professional ballroom dancer. I have more cocktail dresses than you can shake a martini at and the last time I went out for cocktails was oh maybe...2008? See here for a breakdown of my useless dress collection! At least if I did outfit posts in them they’d get an outing from the closet!
It is Sketch Challenge week and my first challenge was to learn how to create the sketch using Stampin Up's Digital Studio. Second challenge was to create the card from my sketch. So I say to you all... onward and upward and learn new things. You can make a card or anything else, as long as we can see the sketch in the project, that would be good. Here is the sketch followed by our Design Team Members. Oh by the way, you can change the shape of the elements if you wish, so if your main image is a square that's okay too. Also we would like to again thanks Judy for being a Guest Designer this week. Thanks again for joining us.
was a great excuse to miss class, and for some
That hole keeps on growing to fit the shape of his mind
I'm off to search for some more pictures of our old house. I think I have some of our last bedroom. That should make for a good post. . .
O.S.S is billed as providing a standards compliant environment and toolset, and in the main that seems an entirely fair statement with a vast majority of popular standards and psuedo standards at your disposal. Of course not all standards are equal, and some require extensions that are proprietary in nature.
Westvleteren Blonde, 2011. I was not much impressed by the famous 12 at the brewery, But the blond was a treat. It was even better out of the bottle. A light, spritzy beer with a notable saison yeast character. I have no idea why this beer isn't the legendary one.
**I added this post under “Extra Links” to the right of my blog for easy access.
St Augustine wrote City of God so maybe we should blame him.
What I’ve done here is to separate goals into six categories as follows:
Structurally similar to Tsai Ming Liang’s joyless “A Conversation with God”, Park’s irreverently playful portrait of Seoul would benefit from a little judicious editing. The film is divided into five sections: 1) “Two Views”. Split frame, with busty sex workers on the right, while on the left, seemingly incongruous images appear: a young boy taking a shower, meat in a butcher shop window, and a glove lying in the middle of the road; 2) “Documentary”. Firefighters put out a blazing building; 3) “Panorama Seoul”. A 360 degree view of the smog-covered skyline as seen from an observation tower overlooking the Han river. Above the horizon, statistics dart past enumerating the number of foreigners, public servants, prostitutes, daily liters of excrement, etc.; 4) “Run Horse Run”. A chaotic neon light show of the city at night, to the exuberant strains of Crying Nut’s raunchy punk anthem “Run, Horse, Run”; 5) “Digital Search”. Graffiti, a kindergarten class and distorted telephoto images of pedestrians. (6/10)
Mined since the earliest days,
Follow the links below to access printable daily and weekly time management tools.
But I think in reality, it’s because I’m modest and in reality, very VERY shy! I think that’s why I like being in front of the camera and on stage. I’ve always considered myself an artist of many mediums. When I was young, pencil, charcoal, and watercolor. As I grew up, photography and costuming. I think that’s why I didn’t have problems belly dancing at 200+ lbs. I created these costumes and when I wore them, I shrouded myself in this persona.
We eat what we see, it's that simple. Why do you think every restaurant that offers chicken wings as an appetizer has a picture of them on the menu? Because they are the food with the highest profit ratio. They're incredibly cheap to make, and are therefore the most profitable. A picture dramatically increases the chances of them being ordered. That's why it's there.
For weeks, the project’s developer, Forest City Ratner, and its state sponsor, the Empire State Development Corporation, had deflected questions from bloggers about the arena’s location, saying that they could not divulge information related to security.
Forgiveness could be applied as…:
Ye do lie
Meanwhile fry the dried squid till cook and crispy and set aside
Short interviews with anguished relatives, one of whom is going to form some kind of foundation to push for laws and regulations to make sure this tragedy never happens again. (Oh, by the way, the Twinkie mentions as an aside, all riding mowers sold since 2004 can’t mow in reverse. But there are millions of old lawnmowers out there.)
Yes, the letter is full of grammatical errors, a red flag. This morning I realized that that many of the people who would take this letter seriously won't notice, because their grammar is equally bad.
From the Music fashion style really
in any case.
When she walked into her room and saw the doors she said, "Wow!"
2005
One wonders how our society could treat a traumatised person of any age like this.
Pitcher carefully guided his air boat to a stop as the sounds of the reverberating explosions reached his ears over the roar of his engine.
Life is not perfect. True. But we can make it perfect in our own way. Perfection is perhaps not the absence of any irregularity; rather it is about achieving an understanding about them. And happiness would have lost its lusture without the taste of sorrow. After all “our sweetest songs are those that tell of saddest thought”.
BIRTHDAY PARTY – Prayers on Fire (1981)
My son has high functioning autism, and I worry about his future to the point of obsession. Now, of course I worry about my younger daughter and son. I want them to be happy and successful adults, too, but with Danny, I'm really scared. Scared that he might turn to drugs to deal with his social struggles or in order to fit in. Scared he may someday battle depression because he is so different and -everything--everything!-- seems to be a bigger struggle for him.
Funny the things you end up learning about yourself; after a recent hardware store trip to purchase not one, but three French Cleat hangers, I realized I'm obsessed with large mirrors and wall art.
7) Taste your kimchi and adjust seasoing by adding more anchovy sauce or slat. It should taste a little saltier that you would hope for. Transfer your kimchi into the storage container.
Big news... I am down 8.5 pounds. Crazy right? But, when I think about the amount of carbs and sugars I was eating I'd have to expect that there would be significant weight loss once I removed them, and there was! I know I can't expect these results every week, but I am thrilled with my first week!
I don’t know where “coils of shadow” came from, but I like it. Maybe from this bit from Baudelaire I read yesterday:
We focused our discussion later on, focusing a bit on the idea of context itself. It was pointed out that writers, like James Baldwin, were in search of their identity – be it culturally or any other aspect of identity. Ultimately, most writers focus on the personal. Sure, they play with ideas that are bigger than they are (Colonialism, Orientalism, Surrealism, Magical Realism, Society, Politics, etc.); but the ideas go down to personal experience. The best example I can think of, when it comes to myself, are my epistles. I am playing around with a lot of ideas (What makes identity, myth, culture), but most of what I am writing comes from personal experience – both of my trips to Puerto Rico and my experiences in New York (the here and now).
Over time however decisions will have to be made because you cannot continue to improve equally at all distances without focused training.
India’s truck, 18 wheeler lorries will drive through Bangladesh via special road built for them with our peoples’ money. But Parul or Felani or many Shafiq, Rafiq, Karim, Habib will be shot to death if seen crossing India-Bangladesh border.
Products used;
I've got an extremely grumpy mood and I think it's because I just woke up from a nap. I must have gotten out on the wrong side of the bed or I haven't had enough coffee yet. The sun is shining outside so it's not the weather's fault. I must drink another cup of coffee and see if that will straighten me out. I can't stay grumpy because I am my own worst enemy this way. If I could kick myself in the rear end, I would do it.
Alice Through the Plastic Sheet; Robert Shearman (A Book of Horrors, Jo Fletcher Books)
Sep-22 St. Louis, MO Scottrade Center On Sale Soon
within the cult of glorified psychopathy, there is constant disease and friction, because there is no logic. there is only “weight of history/evidence,” which can be restricted to the point that it shows the opposite of reality. you cannot realistically tell me that the best person to be making “policy” decisions (nanoscale) is the one who has a scripted and definitive answer to a presumptuous and assumption-laden question, also scripted. ok, you can tell me, and you do, by the fact that these pathetic retards are still getting actual votes from the horribly-paid slaves who are only prompted to action by annoying them to the point of tears by interrupting their manipulative poison-flow in highly “regulated” time periods. ok, that half hour is done, next story? you realize that you just ruined someone’s life there, right? it is your problem. we are all a part of this world, and the growing pile of people you berate, badger, and disrespect is getting ridiculous. are you kidding? if the cult of violence isn’t a study in ridiculosity, i don’t know what is.
There were all sorts of fights between the Puerto Rican gangs and the white gangs. It was very much a West Side Story kind of situation. Unfortunately, I was not always a spectator, but I don’t want to glorify it.
(By myself)
Dayna Martin
Pastor Wayne Taylor was next and he gave an encouraging word as well.
We had a good day to day. We saw the little girl's social workers today. It went really well. We are the only carers that they are considering. If she is placed with us it will be by the end of August. Fingers crossed!
And, she drove me to dance lessons, piano lessons, theatre rehearsals, 4-H meetings
So it was a well-tailored quality shirt, from a Jermyn Street tailor, the traditional home of British shirt tailoring (Saville Row, for suits, Jermyn Street for shirts). But this still did not explain why this shirt fit when every other 16½ shirt I had tried in my adult life didn’t. So I had a closer look at this shirt which is when I noticed the third important detail. On the other side of the label was the number 36. I had no idea what it meant but had a feeling that it had something to do with the mystery.
He asks her if she knows anything about the envelope Chi San had with him when they met for coffee and she acts like she’d been worried about it too because they’d somehow gotten switched. Owning up to it is obviously a good move because that way, she can feign some innocence. Yi Gak is a dummy so he swallows it whole but shouldn’t the first question be why she had a ticket for Park Ha in her possession? Then why she didn’t try to get the lease to its rightful owner? Surely there would have been a name on it. Moving on…
Oh woe is fucking me. Seriously.
Off days I was doing precor elliptical for 30-45 min plus my daily weight training
Cant wait!
Desires privatizing Social Security so Wall Street can make money on it. YES
Seasonal photos
Hey Bristol, how’s it going?
It was just unfortunate that the first tune I heard was the THAT theme from Psycho!
There’s no shipwreck here, in fact Ted has it all stitched up, glorious isolation but with satellite channels and food arriving every couple of weeks. You can read him slowly unwinding until Friday turns up, this time a small boy. Ted is livid and this time chases him away!
Its not unusual for teams to take this approach in protesting another teams car. Its less confrontational, as they argue the technologies legality, rather directly protesting another team. There have been several instances of this in the past. The team probably weren’t seriously wanting to use the See-Saw splitter, nor did they feel its use was for reliability reasons. More that they were concerned another team were currently gaining an advantage from its use and wanted the design exposed and its legality confirmed.
5. PA Rt. 22 from Lewistown to Mundy's Corner, then down to Johnstown on Rt. 271. Long runs along the ridges, and a few roller-coaster rides over them. Too bad Johnstown Brewing closed, it was a nice bookend to this trip.
I thought that I am strong enough,
Felsted has yet another 12th century church and I suspect a Saxon one stood there for a while before this time. Again possibly this spot was used as a pagan site even before the Romans began their tour of Brittanica. A lovely church, closed today sadly while they spend money renovating the place. Nice door at the base of the tower, with a Norman arch (please confirm).
I am also excited for the fireworks in Asbury Park tomorrow night - which I must admit is unusual for me. I know it sounds awful, but growing up in a town where they put on a weekly fireworks show in the summer really desensitized me to them.
A massive conspiracy involving 90% of scientists worldwide -- or oil companies spending vast sums to sway opinion, and influence public policy to protect their profits? Decide for yourself.
I am working this St.Patrick's Day, so no lovely Irish dinner for me it seems. So, I decided to make a little something to remind me of Ireland. And nothing, absolutely nothing reminds me of Irish food more that some brown bread and vegetable soup!
1-10 Hopeful Timean 4:33
Hint for the day if your trying to drop some extra pounds…
The case was scheduled for hearing on July 20th, 2011. Medianama reports that they received a statement from Cleartrip stating that the Bombay High Court rejected the plea for injunction and damages, based on the suit filed by Travelocity. One feels however that there is more to come from this case, given the far-flung charges and the insistence that there have been serious economic irregularities on the part of the defendants, aside from the intellectual property theft claims. We will keep an eye out for developments in this case.
Female prostitutes on average earn VND10.6 million per month (over $500) while male prostitutes earn VND6.55 million (over $300), around 2.5 times over the average earning of the group of 20 percent highest income earners in Vietnam…Dr. Nguyen Huu Minh…says that around three fourths of the interviewed prostitutes began …at the age of less than 25; 18 percent of them at the age of 16-18 and around four percent at the age of less than 15…nearly 50 percent…have secondary, high school and university degrees…over 60 percent of the interviewed prostitutes work independently or in a group of friends and acquaintances…Most…said that they became prostitutes because of high income (53 percent)…
Then how come I still HURT so bad? I mean, the evidence is all there in front of me. No more having to question whether his feelings of “love” for me were true or not. No more having to question where his true intentions were. I read it, in blue and white, his WORDS to her. And really, that’s what always had the hold on me….his WORDS. So knowing that that’s all they were, just WORDS, never ACTIONS, why am I hurting from this? It’s not like I lost anything, not really. I just lost the words. But it’s the words that wormed their way into my head and my heart and my soul and set up camp. It’s the words that made me believe nobody could love me the way he did, he was always sorry for every abusive thing he ever did to me. It’s the words that made me live in fear of losing him, the words that made me treat my friends like crap, the words that made me even cut some out of my life. The WORDS controlled me, and how the hell do WORDS control anyone? How did I let that happen? And what’s wrong with me that I’m still hurting from them all? Sticks and stones will break your bones but words will never hurt you? Bullshit.
Today some of the girls tried to stand up when I came into the room and I insisted they sit down (traditional respect for the teacher, but it was alarming to me).
She felt I let her down. And all of the other things didn’t matter. And it didn’t matter that on that day, I didn’t want to even talk to anyone, or leave my house let alone, be front and center for her, yet again.
15.Blow the House Down
Since then we've had 4 releases (demo, promo, mini-cd, album), a lot of line-up changes and live shows all of Greece and finally in August 2010,our debut album released from Amputated Vein Records, in which we have put our most effort up to date.
But I'm not deciding this. You're deciding this.
this drama recurs with movement calm as sleep:
Why am I posting this.... I would love to do a group project of some sort and donate.
Less traffic cops, more POLICE.
A 2% lager is on permanent offer however, and it’s the basics and value range in any given supermarket. What glass to neck it from? There is no branded Sainsbury’s basic’s glass as far as I know. I decide to phone ‘em and ask and got a number here. “I am a beer enthusiast and my favourite beer is Sainsbury’s basics lager, is there a branded glass available with which to drink it that I could have? I’ll happily buy one” fair play to the girl on the other end “Are you having a laugh, is this a wind up?” “Yeh, sorry love” A compromise is in order. Sierra Nevada, very popular among beer fans, is actually piss. It is. There is no denying it. If you disagree you are wrong. So a Sierra Nevada glass it is.
We were on holiday down in Dorset, back at the fantastic house we stayed in back in November, in fact. Lumpy wasn't sleeping well. In fact, he was sleeping the worst he pretty much ever has, waking up every twenty minutes through the whole night. It really was exquisite torture. Initially, we thought it might just be being in a new place, and also getting disturbed by us being in the same room, blundering around getting undressed and daring to turn over in the world's squeakiest bed. But then he started to get odd. He wasn't smiling. Even more weirdly, he wasn't really eating. We knew something was really wrong when he turned his nose up at an Organix Carrot Crispy (aka Giant Baby Wotsits). This was deeply worrying. Normally, Lumpy starts bouncing up and down in a frenzy of squealing excitement at the mere sight of the packet, and will devour a hundredweight without pausing for breath. He was clearly gravely ill.
And justify the light on Nature’s face.
George
To stand on that spot has a curious effect, almost as if one had stepped into Foxe’s pages. It might surprise the modern reader to learn that this is where we can get closest to John Dee, the famous Elizabethan magus, astrologer, alchemist and converser with angels, to stand where he stood, to breath the air he breathed. For Dee was an ordained Catholic priest and one of Bonner’s chaplains, and I like to believe that he was depicted by Foxe’s illustrators amongst those witnessing Bonner’s brutality. Dee’s life turns out to be full of such surprises, and this is what attracted me to write about him in the first place.
Back to Brooklyn
I love a movie...most movies...even the not so good ones...I always have...I try and see all of the nominated films and make my picks before the Academy Awards are given. This year I am behind ...... I have seen Inception and The Kids are All Right....Loved Annette Bening and Julianne Moore together in this film... I felt so so about Inception... as much as I am a fan of Leonardo DiCaprio.
These poems are meant to be read individually. But then, after a few moments of reflection, I thought it would be a better idea to put them all together. Tell me what you think. Enjoy!
Spelled in all capital letters so haters recognize the name, WRITE CLUB pairs the latter-day literary gladiators that are its participants into groups of two. They are given one of a set of opposing topics (Books vs. Movies, Fate vs. Free Will, etc.) and have two weeks to prepare up to five minutes of anything. Stand up, short fiction, personal narrative, or a mix thereof—anything goes in WRITE CLUB. The audience decides the victor, and the unfortunate loser is beheaded then and there, right onstage for everyone to see (disclaimer: this is not even remotely true and I don’t know why anyone would claim it is).
Whatever I did, I wanted to accomplish three simple tasks: have it be an act of service, do something physical, and get out of my comfort zone. Being the dinner cook does all three. Wendy doesn't have to cook, preparing dinner every night requires action, and I normally don't prepare meals that don't involve the barbecue. Cooking for Wendy, Shelby, and me was a bit intimidating but not at all daunting.
But on the bus, the Aussie asked our Bus Captain, Damo, if the was a way the Aussie could delay his trip by a week, and stay with me in Croatia. Damo, in all of his wonders, called the BusAbout offices, and told them he had never seem “something like this – two people have fallen for each other.” After sharing his version of our love story to the BusAbout management, they agreed to swop the departure date, so now the Aussie was going to stay with me in Croatia! I had already pre-paid for a bunch of hotels, so I would get the chance to spoil the Aussie for once.
I have always wanted to interview other strength coaches that are willing to share some of the knowledge and information they have gained from working at a different facility. There is much to learn being a young strength coach and to get different perspectives on training. I asked both Kevin Carr and Brendon Rearick to answer a few questions pertaining to the field and they were awesome enough to take some time out of their busy schedule to answer the questions. I am very thankful that they did. For those who do not know, these guys are coaches at Mike Boyle Strength and Conditioning located in Woburn, MA. Their athletic development facility was voted the #1 gym in America by Men’s Health, and deservedly so.
"Moreover, they are the only game in town. So we’ll just have to let the EDL be what it is. When the time is right, its scope will expand to include other sectors of English society — all of which face the same deadly threat, whether they realize it or not.
Like I said, this book is very short, simple, and sweet. Mr Oto is not my kind of man, but he's a dear and the way he's basically crushing on Sophie makes him seem about half of what his age really is, and I wish I could really see his painting of Sophie as his Crane-Wife. Miss Ruth is a nosy bitch and every word about her made me irritated; what bothers me the most about her, I think, is that there really are people like her in this world. By contrast, I loved Miss Anne and Big Sally. They were probably my favorite characters, and for some reason every time Big Sally was around, I craved hushpuppies. I liked Sophie well enough - despite her upbringing making her rather inhibited and reserved, she doesn't fall totally into step with the other women in the community; she sets crab traps, for example, which also makes me hungry.
Geert Wilders is a very brave man, but you don't have to be brave to follow him; all you have to do is value truth, value our freedom, and never knowingly parrot a lie. Take the trouble to inform yourself, and make your own decisions; don't let the government tell you the difference between right and wrong. Islam is a set of ideas; challenging those ideas and the often horrific consequences of them is not bigoted, nor racist, but sensible. After all, maybe if it underwent the same scrutiny as other religions and political belief systems, it might be ready for the 21st Century some time around the 25th.
I wrote a few chapters, we proposed it to my editor, and she came back suggesting a companion novel rather than a sequel. The nice thing about a companion is that the books can stand on their own. It also gives the author a chance to tell a new story about a different character. Sophie, Isabel's best friend, is a fun girl, and my editor suggested maybe I'd want to try writing a book from Sophie's point of view. Because Sophie is close friends with Isabel, of course readers would find out what happened to Isabel at the baking contest.
So, thinking about worrying and anxiety has been a very interesting and useful process for me, but the real test will be what I choose to do with my newly-found insights. I literally do not know what it feels like to not worry, but I have a feeling that I'm soon going to find out. . . .
But as we all know, there's a price to pay for this shortcut to deep relaxation, just as there is with every shortcut ever devised. We all already know about the opportunity cost of watching TV, all that time spent sitting indoors instead of being outside getting exercise, which has lead in an almost straight line to an epidemic of obesity and diabetes. And most of us are pretty attuned to the fact that advertisers are using the highest powered persuasive techniques ever devised to brainwash our children, and take measures to counteract that. But I'm surprised at how many parents are dismissive about what TV does to our brains.
Please read this as "I must-ash you this...", a little play on words. My family chooses to read this as "must ache" (like I want to hurt you), making me want to change how I spelled it. But the letters are stuck...really stuck. So it will stay the way it is and I hope it's just not that hard for readers to figure out. To me it seems obvious---mustaches all over the page...read "mustache".
Somewhere toward the end of the work day, I was at around 1100 hits for the day. I had one last conversation with Pat. I said I could see it topping out at 1300. Pat said she guessed more like 1500-1800. We bet a coffee and a donut on it, I was so sure I was right. And then I stopped looking at it.
And hurt so very many people
Things really came together in 2008-09. The Eagles went 24-11, winning the Ohio Valley Conference and making their first NCAA Tournament appearance since 1984. MSU faced Alabama State in the First Four, defeating the Hornets before falling to Louisville in the second round.
The last school visit I did - to a lovely school in Welwyn Garden City - went off suddenly and at a most interesting tangent. I was working in the library with a group of Year 8s. It was a great school library with a huge range of fiction.
The high court’s Sala de lo Constitucional also made several key rulings affecting election procedures. This past August it struck down a ban on independent candidates. The ruling was criticized by FMLN leaders who worry that only wealthy individuals – usually rightists – will have the resources to run without party backing. President Funes himself aired concerns that the ruling could lead to campaign financing by organized crime.
She also helped a little girl in her class yesterday who was a litte shy and afraid. She told me she held her hand. This morning, Mrs. Graves told me that D took sweet care of her. Made this mommy's heart so HAPPY.
What? You can't determine from this photo the birthday gift to which I refer?
One thing I didn’t like about Under Her Brass Corset was the amount of sex in the story. I generally avoid erotica because I’m more interested in the characters than in the different positions they use and Under Her Brass Corset has several multi-page sex scenes, plus some self-lovin’. Brenda Williamson also uses some words to refer to Abigail’s lady parts that really didn’t jive for me. Specifically, there’s one word in Chapter 11 that made me double-take because I couldn’t believe she’d used it, particularly since the book is told from Abigail’s perspective. None of the sex is badly written but I really wasn’t expecting as much graphic sex or sexy thoughts in a 70,000 story. These scenes will go over very well with readers who enjoy a lot of spice but I feel compelled to warn you that there’s a lot of it in Under Her Brass Corset.
Mr. Margaret Bassackwards:Besides, we are very much a normal family. Alex has a mother and a father.
it seems I am totally up to date with my plain, no painted or gaudy nails... little did I know!
So this morning I was in bed, more waiting for him to leave, than laziness. But a little of that, too. I lying there thinking, Wow! He left without telling me to do anything!
“The love and support of my family has sustained and supported me throughout the years,” he said. “I love you all.”Since this needs to happen today, I hope my dying brings some solace and closure to the Klima family and their loved ones.”The state of Ohio should not be in the business of killing its citizens.”May God bless us all that fall short.”
Warm a pound of the flour in a cool oven for a few minutes. Meanwhile cream the yeast with a little of the milk, adding a pinch of sugar if you are using dried yeast. When the flour is warmed and the yeast is foaming, mix into the flour the salt and spices, then a make a well in the centre and add the yeast and the rest of the milk. Mix together with a spoon, then use the rest of the flour to dust your hands and the dough so you can work it together for a few minutes, otherwise you become a big sticky mess. You want a rather soft dough, but one not so soft that it would become shapeless as it rises. Incorporate the currants and peel, then cover and leave around 2 hours to double in size.
Publisher: Microsoft Studios
Gamaliel was himself a Pharisee in the tradition of the great Hillel. A generation before Christ there were two great rabbis, Hillel and Shammai. While this is a generalization, many of the rabbinic debates of the first century come down to the opinion of Hillel versus Shammai. With respect to Hellenism, Hillel was more open to Hellenism than Shammai and was therefore more open to cooperation with the Romans.
It’s not widely publicised, but Christian Dior’s childhood home in Granville, ‘Villa Les Rhumbs’, is open to the public. The only ‘Musée de France’ dedicated to a couturier, a this 19th-century, Belle Epoque-style clifftop villa overlooking the sea features hundreds of Haute Couture garments over three floors, including designs by Christian Dior, Yves Saint-Laurent, Marc Bohan, Gianfranco Ferré for Christian Dior and John Galliano. There is also a gorgeous garden, designed by Dior’s mother, which is beautiful in the spring and summer.
Happy (semi-) healthy eating!
Pretty sure she had not a clue what the crap was going on.
I said to her "How about $0.50?"
Apparently in tulle, it’s nonexistent. To ward off the machine’s tendency to eat the tulle, I gathered it to a length of ribbon. Once I figured out how to arrange this properly it wasn’t so bad, but for whatever reason the stitch-lengths were minute, and completely insensitive to my twiddling with the set stitch length. So instead of gathering at a nice 2:1-or-thereabouts ratio, it gathered my entire strip of doubled tulle into just over 2m. Not the 4-5m range I was looking for.
On the other hand, I worry for her. The role requires her to stand in the kitchen of the haunted house for 30 min to 45 min in a stretch. Under dim lights, loud horror soundtrack and an oppressive drone. She gets to rest in between sets, but the resting area has uneven floors and fellow scare-actors tend to rush in and out.
I particularly love being surrounded by old books and sometimes feel as if I am in the literary equivalent of a telephone exchange, connected by invisible skeins to the lives of strangers. However great or absurd the titles are, they have furnished both rooms and minds. My passion, I suppose, is to try and find them new owners.
However, he still was not convinced that black and white could live harmoniously, and planned to have freed slaves colonized either in Africa or Cuba. However, his views were changed once again by the bravery of those men of color who chose to fight for their own freedom. After the 54th Massachusetts Volunteer Infantry, the first regiment of black troops to fight in the war, showed courage in the face of fire at Battery Wagner in South Carolina, nearly 200,000 African Americans would sign up in order to fight for their own freedom. After this, the colonization idea was scrapped, and Lincoln credited the men of color with helping to turn the tide of the Civil War.
I like to think that we are all equals.
- AirPlay integration
But, as if the day couldn't get any better, it did. Alex took us to another indigenous community school. This one was more easily accessible and slightly better equipped.... The children were waiting for us, and since we were pros at playing, at this point, off we went... Soccer, coloring, puzzles, stickers, blood pressures, etc. they were hysterically funny, and in such great spirits. These children (at both schools) had nothing, but they were so grateful that we were there spending the time playing with them. This was my favorite day of the whole trip.... Despite the crying in the beginning. Cause for going out on the town that evening.
Doormat…Yikes! Who wants to admit that they are or have been a doormat? The more common word, and perhaps the energetically lighter word, is people pleaser. Either way, they are the same thing. I can tell you that I’ve been both, and I was both for a very long time…not a nice place to be. I can also tell you that I’ve seen more women in that place than I care to count. It’s almost as if it’s wired into our DNA regardless of culture, religion, or upbringing.
We see here that Nicodemus came to Jesus on the level of a great teacher and miracle worker. Nicodemus was himself a well respected teacher among the Jews and was a Pharisee. He came to Jesus for knowledge. “Rabbi, we KNOW …”. He thought that he knew where Jesus was coming from and so he was looking for more knowledge so that he could implement a better “method” in his work. His heart was in the right place, in a sense. He wanted to help people. But he was still approaching the Lord on a totally irrelevant playing field. But before another word could come out of his mouth, the Lord totally switches the playing field. Nicodemus was approaching the Lord intellectually and in the realm of the soul-life. The Lord refuses to engage him on that level. So what does Jesus do?
And never look down to see my shadow.
The sister-in-law teases
3. Punch It Summer
After lunch it started to rain.
I choose the winner randomly using random.org. Thanks for reading! I am so glad I get to give you awesome ladies a gift every now and again.
1378 W Grand Ave
I find that comedy does have lots of roles for older women. Amy Poehler, Tina Fey, Martha Plimpton, Sofia Vergara, and Julie Bowen are all older women in comedy shows that are very popular. They’re also all born in 1970-1972. I think that this is more a syndrome of the “40 is the new 30″ mentality, and certainly all of these women look fabulous. But most of them are relegated to the position of mother, which is fine, but it’s nice when women get to play other kinds of parts, because being mothers is not the only thing women do. I’m sure I’m missing a lot of older female parts on television that are out there right now, but I’m sure any of you who know them will be kind enough to thoroughly inform me.
“Bulgaria Conducting Workshop” with the Pleven Philharmonic, Bulgaria. The
After my conversation with Meredith, it was blatantly obvious that I couldn’t keep seeing Craig. She explained to me that when a guy says “I can’t”, it usually means that he really cannot have a relationship, or doesn’t want one with you. There is no point in sticking around and waiting for him to change his mind, because he won’t. It’s not like with women where we say one thing and do another. With men, it’s black and white, there is no grey area.
I went to see Clash of the Titans yesterday, in 3D - the remake of the 1981 staple of Sunday afternoon TV re-runs, with Laurence Olivier and Tim Pigott-Smith. And bowled over I was not. Where to begin?
1 big marshmallow
Unlike general law where the intent of the party plays a critical role in a finding of fraud, the current line of cases decided by the Trademark Trial and Appeal Board ("TTAB") results in a finding of fraud where the applicant or registrant “knew or should have known” that the statements were false. The subjective intent of the party is not a factor - it is the objective manifestation of the party’s intent that is determinative in a finding of fraud before the TTAB.
yourself in a similar situation. First, do all
Happy 20th Birthday Sister Face!
Once Treadwell’s last season was a close, according to his journal, he had a confrontation with an official at the airport about his airline ticket. In response to this, he wrote: “Oh how I hate the human world.” He decided to return to “Grizzly Maze” where he would spend another two-weeks in order to calm himself. However, this would mark the latest in the season that he has ever camped in the Alaskan wilds, and upon his return, he found that the bears he knew for so many years had left in order to go inland for hibernation. Instead, he found larger bears from inland that had come to eat the remaining fish carcasses in the river. On his video camera, Timothy stated that he did not feel as comfortable around these bears, and when it was time for him to leave, the air taxi pilot that was supposed to pick him up found his campsite to be abandoned. Officials were notified, and soon after, Treadwell’s mangled head, spine, and part of an arm were found by the river. Two bears were killed at the scene when they charged at officials, and more of Treadwell’s remains were found inside. Audio from his video tape reveals that the last thing he tried to do was save his girlfriend, Amie Huguenard, who had been spending her second Summer with Treadwell and the bears. Despite Treadwell’s efforts, her remains were also found on scene.
The project has been going very well we have met a lot of very interesting people. We looking forward to meeting more. If YOU want us to talk about you in our blog, you need to give us a call at 718-228-7928 to set up a time to be interviewed!
In 1809, Beethoven wanted to leave Vienna, at the invitation of Jerome Bonaparte. His long-standing friend, the Countess Anna Marie Erdody, kept him at Vienna with the help of his wealthiest admires: the Archbishop Rudolph, the Prince Lobkowitz, and the Prince Kinsky. These men gave Beethoven and annual grant of 4,000 florins, allowing him to live without financial constraint. The only condition was that Beethoven was not to leave Vienna. Beethoven accepted. This grant made him the first independent composer. Before this contract musicians and composers alike (even Bach, Mozart, and Haydn), became servants in the houses of wealthy aristocratic families. They were thus part of the domestic staff, with no more rights than any other, but with the added task of composition and performance. Thus, for the musician of the day, Beethoven had outstanding circumstances and he was free to write what he wanted, when he wanted, under command or not, as he pleased.
The remaining chapters give examples of different types of situations where this has happened to him; situations given support examples of thought from literature, psychology, religion and history – hence the 36 pages of footnotes, bibliography and index at the end of the book.
*I was a little nervous! I think a skipped a word. Oh, and sorry this is so dark. I guess it's okay since the whole point is to hear me speak anyway!
Scenes from the Fair...
Access to basic essential services: In South Africa, we joke about state hospitals. We joke about the nursing staff being really sucky, and we jest about the quality of public medical care. The simple fact is that all of the good doctors and nurses are overseas, where they are appreciated (with salaries) and put in environments that are clean, healthy and safe. My daughter was born on the British National Health Service. While it was amusing at times, the facilities in the public hospitals are world-class, the doctors are well paid and sourced from around the world. My wife’s pregnancy and my daughter’s subsequent birth cost not a cent. In fact, each time we went to the hospital for a check-up, we were offered a refund on our transport costs. When my daughter was born, the local government put £250 in trust for her to use when she’s 16. When my children get sick, the local GP will treat them, or even make a house call. No charge. Medicine is free for them. No matter what. In fact, medicine is free for EVERYONE in Britain, although you may have to pay a surplus ‘prescription fee‘ which is never more than £7.50 per prescription. Kids under 16 are waived from this fee, as are the disabled, retired and unemployed. Regardless of the condition, the medicine is available, and the government’s health service provides it.
The first four of those are all by Australian Authors. I had two 5 stars reads (one of which I knew I’d have because I loved it years ago and another one which was a bit of a pleasant surprise).
I went and much to my surprise, I really did have fun! I learned a lot and dare I say, I will go back! In fact, a girlfriend of mine and I signed up for a ladies only beginners gun class! I am looking forward to it for sure!
A CD containing Bruckner’s music for piano may come as something of a surprise, since you either need to know a lot about Bruckner, or conversely very little, to expect such a thing. Yet here it is, and very interesting it is too. Fumiko Shiraga plays very well, and her performances can be described as dedicated and thoroughly prepared. In addition the BIS recorded sound is as good as we have come to expect from this reliable company: full toned and atmospheric, with due attention to detail.
Nuala will also read from her poetry collection The Juno Charm (Salmon)
anyway, this post is turning into a long one, and i truly only intended to pop in and post a few pics. i guess i'm finding blogging to be my little vacation from vacation. and on a day where it's too cold to swim at the pool or the ocean, that works out well.
In order to arrest the waning public support for their case, the leaders of the camp ought to consider whether such a withdrawal would be produce, not only sympathy for their cause but increase the chances of re-igniting the initial support they enjoyed at the outset.
Wine tasting is one of my favorite leisure-time activities. But, since alcohol is basically illegal in the UAE (more on that later) I won’t be doing much wine tasting. This weekend my good friend Elise and I hit up three new wineries (new to us). It was a great day, perfect weather and wonderful company. I hope there will be many more before August.
From the outside, the Ivy is discreet. You would hardly know it was there. Simple, but beautiful leaded stain glass windows give nothing of what is inside away, a heavy door reveals no secrets, and the presence of a very proper, topped and tailed doorman might go someway to unnerve mere mortals looking for a bite to eat.
Numba 2: They bark, constantly and I'm not allowed to put my hand down since my roommates (Grandma's boy reference, it means parents) think I'm an abuser and I'll break their little bones.
and pick it back up, upon return.
1. Combine the flour, sugar, yeast, and salt in a bowl. In a small bowl combine the egg and oil. Heat the milk to warm (120 - 130F). Add the milk to the flour mixture, then work in the egg mixture to make a smooth, elastic and not sticky dough. If needed add more flour.
Don't forget to check out my other post for today before this one! I played with LOTS of washi tape and a super cute puppy stamp that I just LOVE! Thanks for stopping by and thanks for your comments! I'll be visiting you soon!
... when you’ve had a beer.
Chocolate Malt (US) 0.500lb Grain 2.8%
Together, we make an interesting pair, I believe;
The show in question adopts the format of the paranormal investigation. A group of characters set out to probe into hauntings. These characters include Fred, a typical alpha male; Daphne, a dumb but foxy redhead who is possibly Fred's lover; Velma, an intellectual (lesbian?) analyst; and a pair of pragmatic, hungry survivors, Shaggy and Scooby-Doo. The last character in this list lends his name to the show itself. Scooby-Doo.
There will be more paper collage, extraordinary pieces of jewelry, textile wall hangings... and eventually (should my ideas plan out) ceramics and....dolls! Yes dolls. Big ones, at least 3 foot tall. How does one ship that? Carefully, I would think.
He restoreth my soul: He leadeth me in the paths of righteousness for His name's sake.
The selection and translation by Charles De Wolf were beautifully accomplished. They revealed Akutagawa's preoccupations with themes centering on adultery, Christian legends, the decay of a generation, and suicide.
Our first challenge and DT call will start on Monday the 13th June (Australian time)
Since many of the blogs I follow are doing a day in the life of their homeschool situations I decided why not join in. So with the same disclaimer that their is no typical day in our classroom here is our "usual" day, or what I hope it to be.
We started off with a brunch at Urban Solace, a North Park restaurant serving up contemporary American fare with a few eclectic twists. For the table, we shared the buttermilk cinnamon roll with cream cheese frosting and pecan butter sauce. While decadent, I'm surprised that this roll doesn't taste particularly heavy. The butter pecan sauce wasn't too sweet, and the frosting was whipped to an almost cloud-like frothiness.
After all the sturm und drang about Catwoman’s costume, none of us paid as much attention as we should have to those set pictures of Anne Hathaway as Selina Kyle. Just look what she’s reading in this candid shot.
We used eggs for a sound about a train---the eggs sound like a train going chugga, chugga, chugga!
It’s a masterpiece of 1970s spoken word proto-rap, that golden sunrise of hip hop, when politics and real issues dominated the content of songs rather than materialism, homophobia and sexism. It’s clever, witty, satirical and potent. Enjoy.
/opt/VRTS/man/man7
And for us it was a most entertaining afternoon's walk.
The mala I wear now was given to me by a Buddhist priest who happened to be the brother of my son’s “J” mom (self-appointed Japanese “mom”) in Japan. We visited her brother’s Pure Land Temple in Satsumasendai and toured its funerary altar (where she showed us where her ashes will be placed) as well as its community shrine and spent time drinking tea and chatting. IB’s “J” mom shared that the temple has been in her family since her grandfather and had only recently been built into a more modern structure. Before it was simply a part of her grandparents’ home.
Awards, literary or otherwise, are tricky things. To paraphrase the old saying: you can please some of the people all of the time, and all of the people some of the time, but you can not please all of the people all of the time.
Records show the younger Kenney had been released from prison June 12 — five days before the suspected killing. He had spent more than a year behind bars after convictions for grand theft, burglary and aggravated battery stemming from cases in 2004 and 2005.
Simon Dedvukaj, 26, Mohegan Lake, N.Y.
4) Remove the crust from the panettone (and enjoy..) and slice the rest into 2cm slices.
And guess what? Thai House was closed.
- Wall Sit (1 minute)
** Get a good night's sleep. However you do it! Ask your doctor about sleep aids. Sometimes this is all that works with a wedding planned for the next day. Trust me, I have seen the most miserable brides on their wedding day , tired looking, feeling bad. You know how you look and feel when you have not gotten enough sleep.
Sponsored by The Stamp Fairy -Win $ 9.00 To spend at their store Wee!!!
How is transitional kindergarten different from preschool?
before and after each run.
Again, an update!!
Orchestra/Ensemble: Danish National Radio Choir, Danish National Radio Symphony Orchestra
“He was a pussy!” they barked contemptuously, before wandering off to look for a baboon to molest.
Buffalo Bisons Star Wars Night – 6:00 p.m.- 10:00 p.m. – Coca Cola Field
Until the drugs wore off
They brought up presents for me to unwrap too! Meri had made me buy without my knowledge, a collage photo frame that held a bunch of various pictures of our family in it. SO sweet! Maddy had taken a deck of cards and on each card, written something she loves about me as her mother. SO thoughtful! However I didn't realize that "You take a lot of time to make me dresses" was a good thing...
Chocolate Frosting:
Dinner would be some sort of stew or casserole. By rights it ought to be rabbit stew, but I haven't the heart to cook bunnies (which I know is hypocritical of me because I like other meat) so maybe it would be chicken stew, with carrots and parsnips, and a few good taters.
Another update: 3.) This blog post has now reached +8,000 views.
The tag line on this ad is "The name on the tip of her tongue is Petti." Rather a provocative image for a 1961 women's magazine, and that's a rather provocative swimsuit! Petti of Encino offered this cotton sharkskin suit in junior sizes. The front lacing is adjustable and the suit had an inner bra. Suit sold in 1961 for $17 (about $132 in today's dollar.)
The Oklahoma State House has launched investigations in the past in instances of impropriety in government including the two most recent incidents involving former Insurance Commissioner Carol Fisher and former State Auditor Jeff McMahan.
Porteños are as hooked on celebrity culture as anyone else – and Argentina’s got talent, Martin Gambarotta, political editor of the Buenos Aires Herald draws up the city’s A-List.
2. What’s going on in the brain (Marc reporting)
She went back to her desk. "C'est tous?" (That's all?) I said. "C'est tous!" she said.
just kidding, your treat is at the end of today's post.
Rumor has it that there is going to be an update that will change this. I have to admit I have raved about this issue all day. I am frustrated and not enjoying PvP.
Then looked back into the parking lot where the rest of the family was still in the process of unloading/loading.
This is the Loreal Magic Lumi Light Infusing Primer. It’s a pretty slim bottle, so you’re not really getting a lot of product for the price, although you only need to use one pump for it to work. I really like the pearly white and rose gold coloring of the packaging! Can’t wait to try it!
Tanner silently counted to ten. “We’ll hoof it from here,”
Yeah, the amount of labored slapstick is so overdone here that it seems Raffill and Sherman over-thought every last sight gag to death and then filmed it to death so as to drain all the life from it. Destroying robot after robot, tickling headless guys under the nose, introducing space herpies as a variation of the 1979 Alien creature, then using a set of steel jaws to castrate guys on a conveyor belt is conceivably funny, but not the way it's done here. You just end up beaten over the head relentlessly with gags so hard and so often that head trauma is a certainty.
of Venus by Anais Nin. I first read it when I was 15. Titillating and beautiful it opened my world up. Inappropriate for me to read by most standards, something about the lyrical self awareness of her writing affected me much more strongly than the erotic subject matter she chose. Eventually her diaries were what truly moved me. She wrote about things that could be insane and beautiful, sensual and painful, necessary and immoral at the same time. Her writing challenged me and continues to do so.
These results seem expectable. Too expectable, in fact. Yes, prostate cancer occurs more often in African Americans than in Africans, but this difference is due to underreporting and shorter life expectancy in Africa. Keep in mind that prostate cancer tends to be diagnosed late in life (Ogunbiyi & Shittu, 1999; Osegbe, 1997).
Meanwhile, I was helping another friend to compile a book about the recent history of Knoydart, a task that involved interviewing a few of the area’s longest-standing inhabitants. I was taken to some pretty far-flung spots and I heard some fascinating stories.
Osborne said: “It’s a very tough situation when you’re recovering from these enormous debts that Britain built up in the good years.”
